California, session 20252026, AB103.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Item 3900-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022 is amended to read: 3900-101-0001—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board ........................ 802,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 150,000,000 (2) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 612,000,000 (3) 3530-Community Air Protection ........................ 40,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule 1 shall be used to reduce agricultural sector emissions by providing grants, rebates, and other financial incentives for agricultural harvesting equipment, heavy-duty trucks, agricultural pump engines, tractors, and other diesel equipment used in agricultural operations. Funding for agricultural diesel replacement and upgrades shall be based on criteria that include the following: (i) the diesel particulate matter emissions and exposures in an air district, and (ii) the NOx and PM 2.5 emissions and attainment status in each district. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be used as follows: (a) $75,000,000 for zero emission drayage trucks to be administered through the Hybrid and Zero Emission Truck and Bus Voucher Incentive Project. (1) Eligibility for these incentive funds shall be administered in a manner that enhances market development of medium- and heavy-duty vehicles and benefits disadvantaged communities and small businesses. (2) The State Air Resources Board shall, prior to January 1, 2024, limit the number and award amount levels based on fleet size. (3) The board shall establish an amount of incentive funds that will only be available for fleet sizes of less than 100 vehicles in California and shall allocate incentive funds to support pilot projects for smaller fleets and owner-operators. (b) $70,000,000 for zero emission transit buses to be administered through the Hybrid and Zero Emission Truck and Bus Voucher Incentive Project. (c) $255,000,000 shall be used for a suite of equity transportation programs established under the Charge Ahead California Initiative, including, but not limited to, the Clean Cars 4 All Program. A minimum of $125,000,000 shall be used to establish the Clean Cars 4 All Program statewide. In addition, a A minimum of $80,000,000 shall be allocated among the following air districts that are currently operating their own Clean Cars 4 All programs: South Coast Air Quality Management District, San Joaquin Air Pollution Control District, Bay Area Air Quality Management District, Sacramento Metropolitan Air Quality Management District, and San Diego Air Pollution Control District. $10,000,000 shall be used to help low income Californians replace degraded batteries consistent with Section 44274.9 of the Health and Safety Code. The board shall consider increased incentive levels to accommodate increased costs associated with adaptive equipment for eligible Californians with physical disabilities. The State Board shall phase out conventional hybrids from eligibility as a replacement vehicle under the Clean Cars for All program by November 2024, consistent with the adoption of that year's funding plan. (d) $15,000,000 shall be used for the Fluorinated Gases Emission Reduction Incentive Program, established by Chapter 375, Statutes of 2018 (SB 1013). (g) $40,000,000 shall be made available to reduce emissions from commercial harbor craft subject to regulation by the board. In awarding funds, the board shall consider prioritizing projects based on maximizing emission reductions consistent with the commercial harbor craft regulation. The board shall prioritize private ferry operators regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, public ferries, licensed commercial passenger fishing vessels, research vessels, and excursion vessels. (h) $20,000,000 shall be used for accelerating the adoption of ultra-low-global-warming-potential refrigerants through the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to guidelines or other standards adopted and used in administering the funds appropriated in this subprovision. (i) $2,000,000 shall be used for enhanced permitting of prescribed fire burns. 3. $135,000,000 of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be used for zero emission school buses to be administered through the Hybrid and Zero Emission Truck and Voucher Incentive Project. (a) Up to $10,000,000 of the funds allocated in this provision shall be available for administrative costs related to zero emission school buses administered through the Hybrid and Zero Emission Truck and Voucher Incentive Project and funded by Proposition 98 General Funds. (b) The funds allocated in this provision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2029. 4. The funds appropriated in Schedule 3 shall be used for financial incentives to reduce mobile and stationary sources of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants consistent with community emissions reduction programs developed pursuant to Section 44391.2 of the Heath and Safety Code. 5. Except as specified in Provision 3, not more than 5 percent of the amounts appropriated in this item may be used for administrative costs. Except as specified in Provision 3, the funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2025, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2027. SEC. 2. Section 19.56 of the Budget Act of 2022 is amended to read: SEC. 19.56. (a) (1) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities. (2) For allocations in this section that include a designated state entity, the entity shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the paragraphs following each designation. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. (3) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. (4) If an item number for the appropriate department for a state entity does not exist, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, the Department of Finance may create an item number for this purpose. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph. (6) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of allocating authority to a different state entity to facilitate the expenditure of the funds for the intended legislative purpose. Any state entity that allocates funds may also, in consultation with the Department of Finance, use an alternative local fiscal agent that is not identified in this section instead of the fiscal agent designated in this section if necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. Any change to the allocating state entity or fiscal agent made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing at least 30 days, or no sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine, prior to the change. It is the intent of the Legislature to revise this section during the 2022-23 fiscal year to reflect any changes necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. (7) Unless otherwise specified in this section, funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2024, and expenditure until June 30, 2026. (8) Funding provided in this section shall not be used for a purpose subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. If the Department of Finance determines that any allocation would be considered an appropriation for that purpose, the funding shall not be allocated, and the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of that finding. (9) The amounts specified in subdivisions (b) to (m), inclusive, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (b) PARKS AND OPEN SPACE (1) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the Martial Cottle Park Improvements. (B) $5,000,000 to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the California Citrus State Historic Park improvements. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of Bakersfield for the Community Action Partnership of Kern for the Friendship House Community Center Sports Field Repairs. (D) $25,000,000 for the California Citrus State Historic Park Capital improvements. (E) $15,000,000 to the City of Anaheim for the repair and expansion of Boysen Park. (F) $2,500,000 to the City of Glendale for the Mountain Oaks Open Space Acquisition. (G) $2,500,000 to the City of Suisun for Park Upgrades: Prosperity Garden Park and Montebello Vista Park. (H) $1,500,000 to the City of Fairfield for Park Upgrades: Linear Park and Allan Witt Park. (I) $1,300,000 to the City of Twentynine Palms for the rehabbing and complete reconstruction of its community pool. (J) $1,000,000 to the County of Sonoma for the Maxwell Farms Regional Park. (K) $200,000 to the City of South El Monte for the Renovation of New Temple Park facilities. (L) $500,000 to the City of La Mesa for the School and Park Mobility Access improvements. (M) $500,000 to the City of Whittier for the Lighting Installation for the Murphy Ranch Little League. (N) $200,000 to the City of San Gabriel for the La Laguna de San Gabriel Historic Playground (Vincent Lugo Park Restoration). (O) $100,000 to the City of Modesto for the Boys & Girls Clubs of Stanislaus County for the modular unit at Martin Luther King Jr. Park to be moved to a new location adjacent to the Dryden Golf Course: funding for Phase 2. (P) $1,600,000 to the City of Vista for the Luz Duran Park community center and Sheriff’s substation. (Q) $1,500,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Moonlight Beach barrels and storm water repairs. (R) $1,400,000 to the City of Vista for EV charging station. (S) $700,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Cardiff Sport Park LED sports lighting. (T) $600,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Wiro Park and Orpheus Park playground. (U) $15,000,000 to the City of Calexico for the New River Parkway. (V) $8,500,000 for the City of Pico Rivera for the renovation of Rio Hondo Park. (W) $7,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the City of San Diego Parks & Recreation Department: Carmel Knolls Park comfort station; Carmel Mission Park comfort station; Penasquitos Creek Park Comfort Station; Sage Canyon Park concession building plus field renovation; Rancho Bernardo Community Park design and construction of sports field lighting, tennis courts, and parking lot ADA compliance improvements, including dog park off-leash area; Black Mountain Mine Open-Space Area Environmental Study; Canyonside Community Park Tennis Center Expansion, which includes a 5 percent State Parks administration fee. (X) $1,300,000 to the City of Lynwood for the Fernwood Avenue Park Project. (Y) $1,700,000 to the City of Alhambra for Alhambra Parks to build a pocket park, and upgrade, add Wi-Fi connectivity, electric charging stations, and book hold lockers at existing parks. (Z) $1,600,000 to the City of Long Beach for the completion of the El Dorado Regional Park Youth softball and baseball fields. (AA) $1,600,000 to the City of Long Beach for the Stearns Park softball and baseball field improvements. (AB) $1,000,000 to the City of Cupertino for the All-Inclusive Playground at Jollyman Park. (AC) $700,000 to the City of Yorba Linda for the Bryant Ranch Park improvement project. (AD) $2,300,000 to the City and County of San Francisco for the South Sunset clubhouse and playground renovation. (AE) $2,000,000 to the City of South Gate for community facilities, park, or recreation facilities construction, acquisition, or improvements, including, but not limited to, capital outlay related to the municipal auditorium, Hollydale Regional Park improvements, or Circle Park. (AF) $2,000,000 to the City of Corona for Phase II of Renovating Griffin Park. (AG) $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the South Clairemont Community Park recreation center. (AH) $2,000,000 for the City of San Diego for the Martin Luther King, Jr. Community Park Pool upgrade. (AI) $2,000,000 to the Lockeford Community Services District, Parks and Recreation, for building the Lockeford Memorial Park restroom, and for the Lockeford Community Center. (AJ) $6,000,000 to the City and County of San Francisco for the Portsmouth Square renovation. Of this amount: (i) $500,000 shall be used for clubhouse improvements, including kitchen facilities. (ii) $500,000 shall be used for culturally significant public art components in the Square. (iii) $1,000,000 shall be used for capital improvements to Walter U. Lum Place, such as pathways and pedestrian lighting. (iv) The remaining $4,000,000 shall be for additional capital improvements to Portsmouth Square as determined by the city. Any remaining funds not used for this purpose may be spent only for the purposes identified in subclauses (i) to (iii), inclusive. (AK) $3,200,000 to the City of South San Francisco for the Linden Park project. (AL) $3,000,000 for the East Bay Regional Park District for the creation of the first public Thurgood Marshall Regional Park access point. (AM) $2,900,000 to the City of Lakewood for the Lakewood Equestrian Center improvement project or for improvements or construction at other facilities designated by the city. (AN) $2,800,000 to the City of Irvine for the Sweet Shade Park Inclusive Playground. (AO) $10,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles Department of Parks and Recreation for the funding to convert a closed landfill into a new regional park. (AP) $700,000 to the City of Oakland for the Verdese Center Park renovation. (AQ) $300,000 to the City of Encinitas for portable lifeguard towers. (AR) $295,000 to the City of Oakland for Tassafaronga Park upgrades. (AS) $200,000 to the City of Encinitas for beach access improvements. (AT) $150,000 to the City of Encinitas for Olivenhain Trail Enhancement. (AU) $1,700,000 to the City and County of San Francisco, Department of Parks and Recreation, for the Noe Valley Town Square and Precita Park public restrooms; remaining funds would go towards future modular restrooms. (AV) $2,000,000 to the City of Bell Gardens for the Regional Aquatic Center at John Anson Ford Park. (AW) $8,500,000 to the City of Perris for the Foss Field Park renovation. (AX) $10,000,000 to the City of Costa Mesa for the park upgrades for Jack Hammett Sports Complex, TeWinkle Athletic Complex, Fairview Park Mesa, and Shalimar Park. (AY) $4,800,000 to the City of Tustin for the Centennial Park modernization and improvements. (AZ) $900,000 to the City of Lynwood for the Urban Bike Trails and Water Quality Improvements project. (BA) $5,000,000 to the City of Carlsbad for Carlsbad Veterans Memorial Park improvements. (BB) $3,500,000 to the City of Vista for Boys and Girls Club Indoor Soccer Arena project. (BC) $5,000,000 to the City of Hawthorne for the Hawthorne Community Center project. (BD) $2,000,000 to the City of Long Beach for the Houghton Park signature playground project. (BE) $6,000,000 to the City of San Diego for Balboa Park restroom repairs. (BF) $2,500,000 to the City of San Diego for the Emerald Hills Community Park project. (BG) $2,200,000 to the County of Mendocino for the Bower Park restoration project. (BH) $1,035,000 to the City of Oakland for Arroyo Viejo Park improvements. (BI) $9,000,000 to the County of Santa Clara for the Speed City Legacy Project. (BJ) $5,000,000 to the City of San Fernando for a one-time grant to the San Fernando Valley Boys and Girls Club to conduct building maintenance and safety upgrades, close the digital divide, modernize afterschool STEAM activities, and provide afterschool meals. (2) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (A) $6,700,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the National Museum of the Surface Navy at the battleship USS Iowa. (B) $2,500,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Conga Kids: “Discover the Diaspora” Assembly Program; Expansion of Conga Kids’ Premier Residency Programs in the County of Los Angeles; evaluation and curriculum development with UCLA-Luskin School of Social Welfare. (C) $20,000,000 to the City of Sacramento for various community reinvestment projects. (D) $7,200,000 to County of Ventura for the Ventura County Land Trust to complete the capital campaigns for two open space preserves, including an off-property Welcome Center and office space. (E) $6,000,000 to San Francisco Recreation and Parks Department for the Japantown Peace Plaza Renovation. (3) To be allocated by the State Air Resources Board as follows: (A) $3,000,000 for the Sacramento Metropolitan Air Quality Management District for Northern Sacramento air quality improvement projects. (4) To be allocated by the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy as follows: (A) $1,500,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for La Vina: Trail Completion – Altadena. (B) $10,000,000 for Open Space/Wildlife Linkage Acquisition – Mansdorf/Deer Creek Property. (5) To be allocated by the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy as follows: (A) $2,700,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy (RMC) for Clara Oaks to purchase 100 acres of open space in Claremont. (B) $3,800,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy for the walking trail along the San Gabriel River to the Pacific Ocean. (C) $50,000,000 for the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy (RMC): (i) $50,000,000 for the Southeast Los Angeles Cultural Center Project. (ii) The funds appropriated in this subparagraph shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2026. All or part of these funds may be transferred to a local or state department or agency for the purposes specified in this subparagraph. The funds shall be used for capital outlay related to the project, including, but not limited to, relocating the Los Angeles Flood Control District South Imperial Yard and costs related thereto, reimbursing state or local agencies that participate in that relocation, and funding design, development, and planning of the project by state or local agencies. (D) $7,000,000 for the Community Connections to Wildlands Program for Southeast Los Angeles County youth including, but not limited to, qualified capital outlay, programming costs, transportation costs, or necessary food and drink costs for program purposes. (6) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $5,000,000 for the Santa Ana River Conservancy Program. (7) To be allocated by the Ocean Protection Council as follows: (A) $5,600,000 to the University of California, Santa Cruz, the California State University, Monterey Bay, Stanford University, and Center for Blue Economy at the Middlebury for White Shark Monitoring Technology. (B) $3,000,000 to the Monterey Bay Aquarium for the Monterey Bay Aquarium Sea Otters Tank. (8) To be allocated by the Department of Water Resources as follows: (A) $8,500,000 to the City of La Habra for the Coyote Creek and Imperial channel improvement project. (B) $3,000,000 to the City of Azusa for the replacement of the South Reservoir. (C) $21,800,000 to the Alameda County Public Works Agency for the Alameda Creek Restoration Phase III project. (9) To be allocated by the Department of Fish and Wildlife as follows: (A) $2,210,000 to the Greater Los Angeles Zoo Association for supporting community-building biodiversity awareness protection of endangered species and accessibility and inclusivity. (B) $1,900,000 for the City of Rancho Cucamonga for the Rancho Cucamonga Wildlife Detection Initiative. (10) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $2,000,000 to the City of Glendale for the restoration of the Casey Stengel Baseball Field historic Glendale landmark. (B) $10,400,000 to the Spanish Town Heritage Foundation through the County of Riverside Regional Park and Open Space District for the preservation of Trujillo Adobe. (C) $6,000,000 to the City of Fremont for the Savercat Bridge and Trail project. (D) $1,500,000 to the City of Maywood for the Riverfront Park Renovation Project. (E) $600,000 to the City of San Diego for the Mountain View Park Sport Court. (11) $8,000,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for climate resilience projects. (12) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $300,000 to the City of Encinitas for the Marine Safety Connected Coastlines. (B) $5,000,000 to the Palos Verdes Peninsula Land Conservancy for habitat restoration and wildlife mitigation in Rancho Palos Verdes. (13) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $1,200,000 to the City of Rolling Hills Estates Nature Center for construction costs of the Nature Center. (B) $8,500,000 to the City of Pico Rivera for the Smith Park Aquatics Center Renovation. (C) $2,750,000 to the City of La Mirada for the Behringer Park Athletic Field Renovations. (D) $4,450,000 to the City of Redwood to convert downtown Redwood City Parking lots to active park spaces and the creation of the Redwood Creek trail via new boardwalks and pathways. (E) $4,000,000 to the City of Stockton for aquatics and parks facilities. (F) $5,000,000 to the Los Angeles Neighborhood Land Trust county-based nonprofit for the Clara Park Renovation Project and the Maywood Riverfront Park Renovation Project. (G) $5,000,000 to Discovery Cube Los Angeles for the Sustainability Park Project. (14) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the Trust For Public Land for urban greening and sustainable infrastructure in Pacoima. (B) $1,000,000 to the San Diego Unified School District for the development of the EarthLab Open-Air Climate Park. (15) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $2,500,000 to the Land Conservancy of San Luis Obispo County for the Camatta Ranch Preservation. (B) $1,500,000 to the Cayucos Land Conservancy for the Toro Coast Preserve Project. (C) $3,000,000 to the Coastal Conservancy for environmental cleanup, water supply studies, and public access projects in the Eel and Russian River watersheds. (16) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $2,000,000 to the City of Arcata for Humboldt Crabs Ball Park and Carlson City Park improvements. (B) $1,200,000 to the City of Costa Mesa for the Ketchcum-Libolt Park Upgrades. (C) $800,000 to the City of Santa Clara for the Magical Bridge All-Inclusive Playground in Central Park. (D) $2,300,000 to the City of Hermosa Beach for the renovation of the Hermosa Beach Pier. (E) $6,000,000 to the City of Agoura Hills for the Linear Park Project. (17) $1,300,000 to the Puente Hills Habitat Preservation Authority to provide funding for ranger services for firefighting, law enforcement, outdoor education, and protection of the natural resources for trail visitors. (18) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency, $10,000,000 to Discovery Cube Orange County to purchase property adjacent to the science museum and nearby Santiago Creek for construction of an open-air, hands-on STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics Education) Center. (19) To be allocated by the Arts Council, $2,500,000 to the City of Palm Springs for the renovation of the Palm Springs Plaza Theater. (20) $7,000,000 to the City of Carson for the City facilities, parks, and community infrastructure. (21) $6,000,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for the Open Space/Wildlife Linkage Acquisition: protection/acquisition in the Santa Susana Mountains adjacent to existing public parkland. (22) To be allocated by the State Coastal Conservancy as follows: (A) $36,000,000 for the East Bay Recreation and Park District for the Point Molate open space acquisition and clean up. (B) $15,000,000 to the City of Berkeley for the Marina and Pier projects. (23) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Olive Grove Community Park upgrades. (B) $8,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Ward Canyon Park expansion and completion. (C) $150,000 to the City of San Diego for the Serra Mesa trail improvements. (24) $5,000,000 to the State Coastal Conservancy for Phase 2 of the Maritime Museum of San Diego redevelopment project. (25) $1,260,000 to the County of San Diego for the Casa Familiar for creation of Avanzando San Ysidro Community Land Trust. (26) $175,000 to San Diego River Conservancy for San Diego Regional Quality Control Board for technical assistance services. (27) $2,000,000 to the State Coastal Conservancy for the City of San Diego for the Camino de la Costa Viewpoint Coastal and Beach access projects. (28) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $4,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Clay Park Improvements. (B) $600,000 to the City of Taft for the West Side Recreation and Park District for Natatorium swimming pool. (C) $50,000 to the San Diego Mountain Biking Association for the trail restoration in the Mount Laguna Recreation Area. (D) $7,000,000 to the City of Santa Clarita to acquire open space property to preserve the property and protect the natural ecological and historical resources located on the property in perpetuity. (E) $10,200,000 to the City of Long Beach for the East Long Beach El Dorado Park improvements. (29) $150,000 to the Los Angeles Community Garden Council to support two community gardens. (30) $150,000 to the Friends of the LA River for conservation efforts. (31) $100,000,000 to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for grants to local educational agencies and nonprofit childcare facilities receiving government funding for projects consistent with the Urban Forestry Act within schoolsites or properties used by child care facilities that reduce the ambient temperature, including by supporting the urban forest, provided that no less than 30 percent of these funds shall be available for grants to nonprofit child care facilities receiving government funding. (32) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency, California Cultural and Historical Endowment, $5,000,000 for the Great Wall of Los Angeles for the interpretive green bridge. (33) To be allocated by the Wildlife Conservation Board as follows, $3,000,000 for a one-time grant to 40-Acre Conservation League for land conservation, habitat restoration, climate preservation, and wildlife prevention projects. (c) EDUCATION (1) To be allocated by the State Department of Education as follows: (A) $500,000 to the County of Kern for the ShePower Leadership Academy. (1.5) To be allocated by the Department of General Services, Office of Public School Construction as follows: (A) $3,700,000 to OneGeneration for the Expansion Capitol Project. (B) $1,400,000 to the City of Redwood City for the Fair Oaks School turf and light replacement. (C) $500,000 to the Palos Verdes Peninsula Unified School District for facility upgrades. (D) $2,500,000 to Del Norte Unified School District (DNUSD) for architectural work to build a performing arts center at the High School. (E) $200,000 to the Southern Humboldt Unified School District (SHUSD) for feasibility study student for converting campus building into permanent educator and workforce housing. (F) $10,000,000 to the Berryessa Union School District for the Piedmont Middle School gymnasium and window replacement. (G) $3,500,000 to the Torrance Unified School District for solar covered parking lots for high school campuses. (H) The Office of Public School Construction may require the entities specified in this paragraph (1.5) to be subject to any applicable public school construction statutory or regulatory compliance and accountability requirements, as determined by the Office of Public School Construction. (I) The Office of Public School Construction may utilize funding authorized for administrative purposes from existing General Fund appropriations as necessary to allocate funding to the entities specified in this paragraph (1.5). (2) To be allocated by the University of California as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the University of California, San Diego for the Student Mental Health App development. (B) $10,500,000 to the University of California for the UC and CSU Collaborative for Neurodiversity and Learning. (C) $4,000,000 to the University of California, Davis, for the Equine Performance and Rehabilitation Center. (D) $500,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles, for the Asian Pacific American Leadership Foundation for anti-bias education and outreach in partnership with UCLA Asian American Studies Center. (E) $25,000,000 to the University of California, Berkeley, for grants to expand coverage of local public affairs throughout the state. (F) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles, for the CalKIDS Institute, to be used over the course of five years for research, policy, and direct services to promote socioeconomic justice by ensuring that all individuals, groups, and communities have the tools necessary to achieve financial capability and well-being. (3) To be allocated by the California State University as follows: (A) $10,000,000 to the California State University, San Bernardino through the California State University Chancellor’s Office for one-time support to the CSU San Bernardino Masters of Science in Physician Assistant (MSPA) program. (B) $6,000,000 to the California State University, San Diego for the State University East Park and Bike Path Improvement. (C) $3,000,000 to the California State University, San Jose for the State University Moss Landing Marine Laboratory Dock. (D) $2,000,000 to the California State University Channel Islands (CSUCI) for the CSUCI Early Childhood Education Center Capital Project. (E) $1,300,000 to the California State University, Sacramento for improvements to the campus childcare center; development of an artificial intelligence mixed reality classroom. (F) $2,000,000 to the California State University, Fullerton for the CSUF Center for Healthy Neighborhoods. (G) $4,000,000 to the California State University, Fresno for CSU Fresno Mobile Health Units. (H) $5,000,000 to California State University, Dominguez Hills, for the California Black Women’s Think Tank. (I) $1,000,000 to the California Polytechnic State University, Strawberry Center, for emerging strawberry disease research in Monterey and Santa Cruz counties. (4) To be allocated by the California Student Aid Commission as follows: (A) $600,000 to the Cerritos Community College District for one-time support for the Student Transit Fare-less System Initiative - Cerritos College. (5) $5,970,000 to the Associated Students of the University of California, Los Angeles for operational costs, including, but not limited to, utilities, student union, student programming, and academic materials. The amount allocated shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2024. (6) To be allocated by the Department of Technology, as follows, $5,000,000 to the County of Santa Clara to provide the County of Santa Clara’s Office of Education a one-time pass through of funds for development and support of an integrated data system. The Santa Clara County Office of Education shall be the sole administrator of the data system and shall retain sole ownership of all data. (7) $5,000,000 California Children and Families Commission (First 5) to the County of Solano for the First 5 Solano Children and Families Commission to convert a shuttered school into an Early Learning Center. (8) $1,200,000 to the Department of Education for Parents, Educator/Teachers, and Students in Action (PESA) for truancy and absenteeism prevention programming. (9) To be allocated by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development as follows: (A) $2,000,000 for the County of Los Angeles for the Florence-Firestone Technology Career Incubator site acquisition and capital improvements. (B) $1,500,000 to Initiate Change in Our Neighborhoods for a Small Business Incubator and Training Facility in San Fernando Valley. (10) To be allocated by the Department of Education as follows: (A) $500,000 for Poway Unified School District, Escondido Union High School District, and San Marcos Unified School District to support and expand the Step Out Lead Everyday (SOLE) Effects Program. (11) To be allocated by the State Library as follows: (A) $1,900,000 to the City of San Diego to provide funding for improvements at the University Community Branch Library. (B) $500,000 to the Latino Legacy Foundation for the multimedia online book project. (C) $3,000,000 to the City of Downey for the New Downey Family YMCA. (12) To be allocated by the California Student Aid Commission, $1,400,000 to Promises2Kids for the Guardian to Gateway Project. (13) To be allocated by the California Workforce Development Board as follows: (A) $3,500,000 to the City of Compton for the P-Tech Conversion of Roosevelt High. (B) $300,000 to the New Filmmakers Los Angeles for high school mentorship programs. (14) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services, $700,000 to the Trinity Alps Unified School District (TAUSD) for generators to assist the school district to serve as a shelter for fire and winter storm evacuees. (d) PUBLIC SAFETY AND FIRE PREVENTION (1) To be allocated by the Judicial Council as follows: (A) $500,000 to the City of Redondo Beach for the Homeless Courts Program to continue their homeless court program, which helps participants into housing and provides them with services that facilitate stabilization, such as mental health, alcohol and substance abuse, and access to job training. (2) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the County of Orange for the Transitional Youth Housing Facility construction. (3) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the Southern Marin Fire Protection District for the Southern Marin Fire Protection District, vegetation management and evacuation route capacity improvements. (B) $1,500,000 to the County of Kings for the Kings County Fire Department upgrades. (C) $1,100,000 to the City of Glendale for the Active Transportation and Wildfire Prevention Infrastructure. (D) $5,000,000 to the San Bernardino County Fire Protection District for the Hesperia High Desert Fire Headquarters project. (E) $1,500,000 to the City of Rancho Palos Verdes for a wildfire detection system for the Palos Verde peninsula. (F) $800,000 to the Moraga-Orinda Fire District for a Three-Year Pilot Program for Two Wildland Fire Specialists to Work with Residents to Mitigate Fire Risk. (G) $20,000 to the County of Los Angeles, Sheriff’s Department, for trailer repair. (4) To be allocated by the California Conservation Corps as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the California Conservation Corps Foundation (CCCF) for capacity building and continued and expanded programming in support of the California Conservation Corps corpsmembers and the State of California. (5) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the County of Merced for the Merced County Public Safety Radio System Replacement. (B) $1,000,000 to the Reclamation District 1001 (RD 1001) for the RD 1001 Pump Station. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of San Diego Police for the Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force (ICAC) for updated training, new investigator positions, and the ever-evolving specialized equipment needed to protect sexual exploitation and the arrest of sexual predators. (D) $1,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for the Roseland 8 fire station. (E) $1,000,000 to the City of Sausalito for sea level rise mitigation. (F) $2,000,000 to the San Marcos Fire Department for two needed projects for the department. (G) $500,000 to the Los Angeles Fire Department for the two new heli-hydrant locations and automatic fill valve retrofits. (H) $200,000 to the City of Corona for the Community Wildfire Protection Plan. (I) $5,200,000 to the City of Palo Alto for the replacement of Fire Station 4 that is operationally and technologically deficient. (J) $5,000,000 to the City of Fowler for new police headquarters. (K) $7,000,000 to the County of San Bernardino for the New Fire Station Construction in San Bernardino Supervisorial District 5. (L) $8,100,000 to the Amador Fire Protection District for a new Amador Fire Protection District Fire Station. (M) $8,000,000 to the Deer Springs Fire Protection District for the District Station 2 Permanent Facility. (N) $13,000,000 to the Sacramento Metropolitan Fire District for the Zinfandel Fire Training Facility. (O) $1,000,000 to the San Bernardino County Fire District for firefighting equipment for the Wrightwood Station. (P) $1,250,000 to the City of King for the acquisition of a Quint Aerial Apparatus and Security Camera System. (Q) $2,000,000 to the City of Soledad for a fire engine. (6) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $250,000 to the City of Coalinga for public safety technology upgrades and improvements. (B) $1,500,000 to the City of Mendota for a new police station and council chambers. (C) $10,000,000 for the Medication-Assisted Treatment Grant Program, pursuant to Sections 6047.1 to 6047.4, inclusive, of the Penal Code. (7) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation, $1,200,000 to the City of Los Angeles for drought resistant landscaping and irrigation along San Vicente Boulevard to support the City’s biodiversity initiatives. (8) To be allocated by the Office Emergency Services as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the City of Merced for capital costs for Merced Regional Fire Training Station, phase 1. (B) $10,000,000 to the City of Porterville for an Emergency Operator Center. (C) $5,000,000 to the City of Sanger for the renovation of an outdated dispatch center. (D) $2,000,000 to the Lemoore Volunteer Fire Department for new fire department updated equipment and training. (E) $7,000,000 to the City of Farmersville for fire station construction. (9) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $2,500,000 to the City of Parlier for updating a police station. (B) $6,000,000 to the City of Shafter for new fire and police substation construction. (C) $7,000,000 to the City of Woodlake for a new Civic Center, Police Department, and City Hall Administration and Citizen Service Center. (10) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $2,000,000 for the City of Dinuba for fire department equipment and training. (B) $2,000,000 to the City of Lindsay for updating fire equipment and training. (C) $2,750,000 to the Fresno County Fire Protection District for new fire station and equipment. (D) $4,500,000 to the City of Selma for new fire station construction. (E) $4,000,000 to Kings County Fire Department for updating fire facilities and equipment. (F) $1,500,000 to the City of Reedley for updating outdated communication equipment for police and fire departments. (G) $5,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for the Fire Station 8 replacement. (H) $16,950,000 to the Orange County Fire Authority for the new Wildland Hand Crew Station, vehicles, and equipment. (I) $7,000,000 for grants to municipal entities for costs of municipal public services related to 2026 FIFA World Cup matches in Northern California and Southern California. The funds shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure through June 30, 2027. In consultation with affected local governments, the Office of Emergency Services shall distribute grants pursuant to a methodology it develops, which includes considerations that communities hosting more matches and higher-profile matches during the World Cup shall receive priority for funding. (J) $7,000,000 to the Indian Valley Community Services District for Greenville recovery and rebuilding costs resulting from the Dixie Fire. (K) $2,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles to reimburse public safety costs incurred due to the Summit of the Americas. (11) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections as follows: (A) $250,000 to Northeast Graffiti Busters for field equipment and supplies. (B) $555,000 to Champions in Service for tattoo removal services. (C) $200,000 to the Colton Police Department for the purchase of two off-highway vehicles, a tow vehicle, and safety gear. (D) $1,000,000 to the California Police Activities League for the Youth Apprenticeship Readiness Accelerator (YARA) Program. Of this amount, $500,000 shall be allocated for the YARA program in Ventura County and $500,000 shall be allocated to support the expansion of the program to Santa Barbara County. (E) $8,000,000 to the North Orange County Public Safety Collaborative via the Board of State and Community Corrections to continue collaboration efforts. (F) $1,500,000 to the City of Suisun City for public safety upgrades. (12) To be allocated by the Judicial Council, $1,500,000 to the Judicial Council for the County of Riverside for the California Court of Appeal, Fourth District, Division Two (Riverside). (13) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services as follows: (A) $3,500,000 to the City of Rancho Cucamonga for the CORE Academy Training Facility. (B) $3,000,000 to the Wilton Fire Protection District for a new fire station and training facility. (C) $2,000,000 to the San Diego Zoo Safari Park for wildfire mitigation projects. (D) $500,000 to the North County Fire Protection District for the new Fire Station #4. (E) $250,000 to the City of Escondido for the Escondido Fire Department Critical Infrastructure of response headsets and training tower refurbishment. (e) WATER, DROUGHT, AND OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE (1) To be allocated by the Department of Water Resources as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the Marin Municipal Water District for the San Geronimo Emergency Generator. (B) $1,800,000 to the City of Yucaipa for the Upper Wildwood Creek Basin Project. (C) $9,000,000 to the County of Napa for water infrastructure and wildfire related needs in the cities of St. Helena and Napa and to support the American Canyon Boys and Girls Club. (D) $200,000 to Brawley Tower Removal for the removal of the Brawley Tower located at 964 H Street, City of Brawley. (E) $6,163,000 to the Monterey County Water Resources Agency for Nacimiento Dam Maintenance projects. (F) $2,000,000 to the Big Sur Land Trust for a green infrastructure project to reduce flood risks and restore habitat. (G) $1,500,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for water use efficiency appliances. (H) $3,000,000 to the City of Pasadena for the Rose Bowl Gas and Water Infrastructure Improvements. (I) $5,000,000 for research, proof of concept, and a preliminary feasibility study related to a project for the inter-basin conveyance of water. The department may award a sole source grant to a non-profit organization or government agency with experience in administering government funding for environmental sustainability projects and partnerships with other entities with experience in the field of inter-basin water conveyance. (J) $6,000,000 to the City of Merced for the Merced Creek restoration project. (K) $5,000,000 to the City of Buena Park for water system improvements. (L) $2,000,000 for Dry Wine Grape Farming Outreach to provide funds through the Water Use Efficiency Program to any of the following: nonprofit organizations, resource conservation districts, or the University of California Cooperative Extension. The funds shall be used to provide outreach and education to wine grape growers on the dry farming of coastal wine grapes. The funds appropriated in this paragraph shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2025. (2) To be allocated by the State Water Resources Control Board as follows: (A) $2,500,000 to the City of Ridgecrest for wastewater treatment plant construction activities related to the new facility. (B) $8,600,000 to the Fairfield-Suisun Sewer District for the Kellogg Resiliency Project. (C) $2,100,000 to the City of Montebello for the Downtown Sewer Infrastructure Improvement Project. (D) $3,000,000 to the City of San Juan Bautista for the Wastewater Project. (E) $5,000,000 to the Patterson Irrigation District for construction of the East-West Conveyance system between the San Joaquin River and the Delta Mendota Canal. (F) $5,000,000 to the City of Madera for the Avenue 13 (Pecan Ave.) Sewer Trunk Main Rehab Phase 1. (G) $7,000,000 to the City of San Fernando for a Nitrate Water Treatment system in Well 2A. (H) $4,800,000 to the Monterey Peninsula Water Management District for the Pure Water Monterey Deep Injection Well No. 6 project. (I) $1,000,000 to the City of Monterey for the Lake El Estero Stormwater Diversion to Sanitary Sewer. (J) $7,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles Bureau of Sanitation for the Hollenbeck Park Lake Rehabilitation and Stormwater Management. (K) $1,000,000 for the Deep Water Intake Location Desalination Study. (3) To be allocated by the California Energy Commission, $4,500,000 to the City of Menlo Park for the citywide electrification project. (4) $17,000,000 to the City of Culver City for smart city technology to purchase and to install smart nodes on city streetlight arms. (5) $1,000,000 to the County of San Luis Obispo for the Deep Water Port Feasibility Study for Offshore Wind Procurement. (6) To be allocated by the San Diego River Conservancy, $2,000,000 to the East County Advanced Water Purification Joint Powers Authority (JPA) for the East County Advanced Water Purification Program. (7) To be allocated by the Wildlife Conservation Board, $15,000,000 to the Resource Conservation District of the Santa Monica Mountains to assist in the recovery of the federally endangered southern steelhead trout (Oncorhynchus mykiss) found in the Santa Monica Mountains with habitat restoration, genetic preservation, and hatcheries. (f) LIBRARIES AND CULTURAL INSTITUTIONS (1) To be allocated by the Department of General Services as follows: (A) $110,000 to the Department of General Services for the Vietnam Veterans Memorial repairs. (B) $2,000,000 to Department of General Services for the International Genocide Memorial. (2) To be allocated by the California State Library as follows: (A) $1,500,000 to the City of San Gabriel for the Asian Youth Center. (B) $14,250,000 to the University of Southern California Institute for American Studies for the TUMO Center. (C) $10,000,000 to the City of Sierra Madre to provide funding for the Sierra Madre Library. (D) $3,000,000 to the City of Elk Grove for the Elk Grove Library for enhanced technology, community meeting space, and needed tenant improvements. (E) $1,300,000 to the City of San Mateo for the Marina Library Reconstruction. (F) $500,000 to the City of Irwindale for the Public Library Improvements, site grading, a new 2-story building, library equipment, community room, mining library, ADA accessible rooms, seating areas, a parking area and surrounding hard/landscape. (G) $400,000 to the Placentia Library District / City of Placentia for the Bookmobile REAd (Reading Engine Adventures) program. (H) $5,000,000 to the City of Pasadena for the Pasadena Central Library Seismic Retrofit. (I) $3,000,000 to the County of Merced for the construction of the Dos Palos Library and rehabilitation of the Del Hale Hall community center. (J) $5,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for building a permanent library for Roseland, an extremely disadvantaged community within Santa Rosa. (K) $1,500,000 to the City of San Diego for the San Carlos Library Phase 1 funding. (L) $20,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Oak Park Library construction. (M) $5,000,000 to the City of Chula Vista for the land and entitlement costs for new library. (N) $4,500,000 to the City of San Diego for the Ocean Beach Library expansion. (O) $25,000,000 to the City of Chula Vista for the Cinematic Arts Library. (P) $6,095,000 to the City of Glendale for Glendale Central Library capital outlay and maintenance. (Q) $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Hillel San Diego for the construction of the Beverly and Joseph Glickman Hillel Center. (2.1) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $2,000,000 for the Warner Center Transportation Technology Infrastructure & Innovation Zone (WCTTIIZ). (3) To be allocated by the California Arts Council as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Building 178 Performing Arts Center. (B) $7,000,000 to the City of Fresno for the Fresno Arts and Facilities to support and expand the cultural arts and their associated facilities in the City of Fresno, supporting the city in preservation, operation, and maintenance costs for facilities such as Arte Americas. (C) $7,000,000 to the Inner City Youth Orchestra for capital costs for the rehearsal and administrative headquarters. (D) $400,000 to the Mid Valley YMCA for a New Youth Institute of Media Arts. (E) $800,000 to Tia Chucha’s Centro Cultural for Arts-based community wellness programming. (F) $5,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the restoration of the Villa Montezuma. (G) $8,000,000 to the City of Guadalupe and Housing Authority of Santa Barbara County (HASBARCO) for the renovation of the historical Royal Theatre and construction of community services center. (H) $2,100,000 to the Studio T Arts & Entertainment for equipment purchases. (I) $10,500,000 for the Pomona Performing Arts Centers. (J) $10,000,000 to the City of Santa Monica for the City Yards Modernization. (4) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the City of Monterey Park for the Vincent Price Art Museum - East Los Angeles College. (B) $2,500,000 to the National Animation Museum (nonprofit) for museum development. (C) $3,000,000 to the City of Azusa for the relocation and preservation of the Old Schoolhouse. (D) $5,500,000 for the LGBTQ Museum. (E) $500,000 for the Tenderloin Museum. (F) $2,100,000 to the California Academy of Science to support the Thriving California Environmental Learning Plan. (G) $3,300,000 to the City of San Diego for the San Diego Natural History Museum for elevators replacement, roof replacement, collections storage restoration, coil system, and building security improvements. (H) $800,000 for the Children’s Creativity Museum. (I) $3,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for building El Museo de Arte Chicano en Los Angeles (Museum of Chicano Art in Los Angeles) in the heart of Boyle Heights. (J) $3,200,000 to the City of Pomona for the Historical Society of Pomona Valley to repair the historic Pomona Ebell Museum. (K) $200,000 to the Ramona Town Hall Association for the Historical Site Redevelopment. (L) $5,000,000 to the California Science Center Foundation for the Air and Space Center. (M) $250,000 to the Oakland Museum for the Digitization project. (5) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (A) $3,000,000 to the County of Stanislaus for the Bonita Pool Project and Leroy F. Fitzsimmons Memorial Park. (B) $1,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the Marston House restoration and repair work. (C) $500,000 to the City of San Diego for the Mountainview Sports Courts tennis court renovation. (g) TRANSPORTATION (1) To be allocated by the Department of Transportation as follows: (A) $6,500,000 to the County of Yolo for the Capay Valley Community and Health Center. (B) $5,000,000 to the City of Cupertino for the reconstruction of the McClellan Road Bridge. (C) $1,000,000 to the San Bernardino County Transportation Authority (SBCTA) to conduct a State Route 247 / 62 Emergency Bypass Lane Study. (D) $2,100,000 to the City of Burbank for the Transportation, Electric Vehicle, and Pedestrian Infrastructure Improvements. (E) $4,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Griffith Park Active Transportation, Safety, and Facility Infrastructure Improvements. (F) $2,000,000 for the Toluca Lake Beautification Partners (TLBP) to expand their Public Private Partnership with Caltrans District 7 for the purposes of revitalizing and enhancing additional freeway sites and underpasses. (G) $2,000,000 to the City of Oxnard for the Rice Ave Over Crossing – Utility Relocation. (H) $1,900,000 to the City of Los Angeles, Department of Transportation, for the Chandler Protected Bike Lane Gap Closure. (I) $20,000,000 to the City of Stockton for the Miracle Mile Pedestrian Crossing Improvements, including Pedestrian Crossing Upgrades Improvements, Public Safety Improvements, and Revitalization Improvements. The Department of Transportation shall convene a Miracle Mile ad hoc workgroup from members of the community at large, including the office of the local Assembly Member, for the purpose of making recommendations to the City of Stockton on how to fulfill the requirements of this subparagraph (I). The City of Stockton shall have until January 1, 2028, to spend down the funds to fulfill the requirements of this subparagraph. (J) $5,000,000 to the Tri-Valley-San Joaquin Regional Rail Authority for the Valley Link Rail Project (Environmental Study and Preliminary Engineering), Cities of Danville, Dublin, Livermore, Pleasanton, and San Ramon. (K) $6,000,000 to the County of Kings Department of Public Works for the Kettleman City Pedestrian Bridge. (L) $1,400,000 to the Port of San Diego for the projects to address abandoned and derelict vessels at Zuniga Shoal. (M) $14,300,000 to the County of Alameda for the Installation of Roundabouts: Crow Canyon Road. (N) $10,000,000 to the City of San Jose for the East San Jose Corridor Safety Improvement Project. (O) $1,500,000 to the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency (SFMTA) for the Sloat between Skyline and Great Highway. (P) $1,200,000 to the San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency (SFMTA) for the Sloat Skyline traffic signal. (Q) $5,000,000 to the Port of Hueneme for the installation of electrical infrastructure to support electric cranes on the wharf port’s terminals for unloading cargo. (R) $7,500,000 to the City of San Fernando for the Pacoima Wash Pedestrian Bridge. (S) $4,500,000 to the City of Simi Valley for the Simi Valley Metrolink Safety Improvement & Quiet Corridor to build a second train track in the City in an effort to improve safety, increase service, and make the existing service more reliable. (T) $3,200,000 to the City of Daly City for the Safe Routes to Schools. (U) $2,000,000 to the City of Paramount for the West Santa Ana Branch Bikeway Project. (V) $1,300,000 to the City of Anaheim, Anaheim Transportation Network (ATN), towards the construction of the Anaheim Transportation Network Facilities. (W) $1,000,000 to the City of Milpitas for the Milpitas Bike Lanes Facilities Enhancement. (X) $3,000,000 to the Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board (CalTrain) for the CalTrain Wireless Optimized Crossing System. (Y) $2,000,000 to the City of Palo Alto for the replacement of the Newell Road Bridge over San Francisquito Creek. (Z) $2,000,000 to the City of Gardena for the revitalization of Gardena Boulevard. (AA) $3,000,000 to the City of Paso Robles for the Creston Road Active Transportation and Bike and School Access improvements. (AB) $2,500,000 to the Monterey-Salinas Transit District for Busway construction. (AC) $4,500,000 to the City of Ontario for Safety Improvements for parks, road safety, and youth services. (AD) $20,000,000 to the Transportation Authority of Marin (TAM) for the Transportation Project to Combat Sea Level Rise, to fund interim solutions for Highway 37 in Marin County. (AE) $10,000,000 to the Transportation Authority of Marin (TAM) for the flooding issues in Marin City along Highway 101. (AF) $4,800,000 to the City of Santa Monica for the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Streetscape (LiNC) to construct medians and bulbouts to promote efficient vehicular travel and enhance pedestrian safety. (AG) $6,000,000 to the City of Fremont for the Fremont I-680/Sabercat Bridge. (AH) $3,500,000 to the City of Belmont for the Belmont Alameda De Las Pulgas Corridor Project. (AI) $5,000,000 to the Bay Area Rapid Transit for the Downtown Berkeley elevator repair and rehabilitation. (AJ) $2,200,000 to the City of Del Mar for the Federal Highway Bridge Program matching funds. (AK) $2,000,000 to the City of Clovis for the Pedestrian Bridge. (AL) $8,000,000 to the County of Placer to remove the steel and concrete wreckage of the former State Route (SR) 49 Bridge that lies in the American River. (AM) $5,000,000 to the County of Kern for the road repairs in the unincorporated town of Woody. (AN) $9,300,000 to the Town of Paradise for the Road Rehabilitation and Maintenance, Town of Paradise. (AO) $2,000,000 to the University of Redlands for a plaza and walkway project for the University of Redlands Rail station at the terminus of the Arrow Line in San Bernardino County. (AP) $1,000,000 to the Solano Transportation Authority (STA) for Electric Vehicle Infrastructure in the Cities of Vacaville, Fairfield, Suisun City and Rio Vista. (AQ) $12,000,000 to the City of Compton for the Artesia Boulevard Bridge. (AR) $10,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Los Angeles Cleantech Incubator (LACI) transportation electrification program. (AS) $5,000,000 to the City of Glendale for active transportation infrastructure. (AT) $5,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the LARiverWay active transportation infrastructure in San Fernando Valley. (AU) $9,000,000 to the City of Inglewood for the Inglewood Connector. (AV) $3,000,000 to the City of Burbank for active transportation infrastructure. (AW) $2,000,000 to the City of Newark for Quiet Zone Safety Improvements. (AX) $1,200,000 to the City of Saratoga to improve pedestrian rail crossings. (AY) $1,000,000 to the Bay Area Rapid Transit District for El Cerrito BART Plaza Station Area and Access Enhancements. (AZ) $760,000 to the City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County for the San Bruno-Millbrae Bike Lane. (BA) $7,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for Broadway South traffic safety projects. (h) HOUSING, HOMELESSNESS PREVENTION, AND FOOD ACCESS (1) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development as follows: (A) $8,000,000 to the County of Santa Cruz, Human Services Department, Housing for Health Division, for the Harvey West Studios Supportive Housing project. (B) $1,400,000 to The Boys and Girls Club of the Los Angeles Harbor for the Department of Housing and Community Development Child Care Services loan (L01-0104). (C) $1,200,000 to the City of Fairfield for the Shelter SOLANO Dining Hall and Kitchen Construction. (D) $15,000,000 to the Riverside County Housing Authority for the Housing Catalyst in Coachella Valley. (E) $8,000,000 to the City of East Palo Alto for the 965 Weeks Street Affordable Housing Development to create 136 homes for low-income families. (F) $2,100,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the San Fernando Valley Community Mental Health Center Homeless Street Pilot Program. (G) $500,000 to the Tenderloin Neighborhood Development Center for the Community space in Sunset District affordable housing project. (H) $16,000,000 to the City of Manteca for a Homelessness Navigation Center. (I) $1,000,000 to the City of Stockton and the Stockton Homeless Shelter for a navigation center project. (J) $5,000,000 to the Goodness Village for capital costs for tiny homes, a community center and a laundry facility. (K) $1,000,000 to the Hope of the Valley Rescue Mission for Homeless Services. (L) $13,000,000 to the County of Ventura for the conversion and modernization of a county administrative building into a shelter/residential use, a Homeless Transition Center and Permanent Supportive Housing complex, and expansion of the Modernization of the Nyeland Acres Community Center. (M) $3,000,000 to the Richardson Bay Regional Authority (RBRA) for supporting Immediate Homeless Housing Needs. (N) $2,000,000 to the County of Marin for supporting Immediate Homeless Housing Needs in Marin County. (O) $3,000,000 to the Sierra Health Foundation for the Pilot Program to Feed Families and Help Restaurants impacted by pandemic. (P) $23,000,000 to the City of Glendale for the Burbank-Glendale-Pasadena Regional Housing Trust to be used to help finance affordable housing projects. (Q) $10,000,000 to the San Gabriel Valley Regional Housing Trust for affordable housing and homelessness projects. (R) $10,000,000 to the Los Angeles County Department of Mental Health for the support of the Los Angeles County Homeless Outreach and Mobile Engagement (HOME) program, Mobile Crisis Outreach Teams, and Haven Hills expansion. Of this amount, $2,500,000 shall be allocated for the expansion of Haven Hills, and $7,500,000, in consultation with the City of Los Angeles, shall be allocated for outreach services and behavioral health infrastructure in the San Fernando Valley. (S) $4,900,000 to the Orange County United Way for the affordable and supportive housing service for voucher holders experiencing homelessness in Orange County. (T) $5,700,000 to the City of Hayward for Mission Paradise for programming to support homeless and seriously mentally ill households. (U) $5,000,000 to Mercy Housing for the Sunnydale HUB project for a community center. (V) $20,000,000 to the Satellite Affordable Housing Associates for Bridge Financing for two affordable housing projects. (W) $500,000 to the Bananas Parent Voices for the Homelessness Families CARE Program. (X) $500,000 to the City of Fremont for the Fremont Housing Navigation Center. (Y) $800,000 to the City of San Jose for the Responsible Landlord Engagement Initiative 2.0. (Z) $1,500,000 to the City of Milpitas for Milpitas Homelessness Prevention and Unhoused Services. (AA) $6,000,000 to the City of Fullerton for the Navigation Center Project. (AB) $5,000,000 to the County of San Bernardino for Youth Diversion funds to expand At Risk Youth Diversion Education Services College Exodus Diversion Project. (AC) $5,000,000 to the City of Santa Rosa for the Caritas Center, housing-focused service center. (AD) $250,000 to the East Bay Community Law Center for the Housing Legal Assistance program. (AE) $3,000,000 to the Bridge to Home SCV to develop an interim housing and homeless services facility in the Santa Clarita Valley. (AF) $25,000,000 to the County of Sacramento to address the concerns of unpermitted homeless population on the American River Parkway. (AG) $5,400,000 to the City of Hayward for the Scattered Site Housing Model to Create Cost-Effective Permanent Housing for unhoused individuals. (AH) $5,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for The California Endowment in support of the Hope Village project. (AI) $3,000,000 to Butterfly’s Haven for the Treehouse Leimert Park affordable housing project. (AJ) $1,000,000 for the Pet Assistance and Support (PAS) Program for qualified homeless shelters and domestic violence shelters to provide shelter, food, and basic veterinary services for pets owned by individuals experiencing homelessness or victims of domestic violence. (2) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services as follows: (A) $20,000,000 to the Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights (CHIRLA) for capital costs for the Los Angeles Welcome Center for Immigrants and Refugees and a Home for The Coalition for Humane Immigrant Rights. (B) $9,000,000 to the County of San Joaquin for the renovation of a county-owned building to serve as an additional 16-bed impatient Psychiatric Health Facility. (C) $7,000,000 to the Partnership for Growth Los Angeles for garden infrastructure improvements and food distribution network. (D) $1,500,000 to the City of Santa Monica for the Behavioral Health Center to support behavioral health needs of vulnerable residents with around-the-clock response, including access to safe temporary housing and stabilizing care. (E) $1,500,000 to the Sunset Youth Services for Capital improvements to their Healing Arts Hub and build-out of new community space at Shirley Chisholm Village / teacher housing project. (F) $150,000 to the Silver Lake, Echo Park, Los Feliz, Atwater Village, and East Hollywood (SELAH) Neighborhood Homeless Coalition for services for individuals and families experiencing homelessness. (2.5) To be allocated by the Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency as follows, $4,000,000 to the Regional Task Force on Homelessness (SDRTFH) to be allocated equally among SDRTFH, the Voices of Our City Choir, and the Monarch School for housing, case management, resource and capacity building. (3) To be allocated by the Office of Planning and Research, Strategic Growth Council, as follows: (A) $10,000,000 for the Jefferson Boulevard Affordable Housing and Park Project. (B) $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for startup costs for emergency shelter for victims of domestic violence. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of Sacramento to provide navigation, rental assistance, and other services for individuals and families experiencing homelessness in and around the California Capitol State Park. (D) $400,000 to the Family Services Agency of Burbank for services for families experiencing homelessness. (i) HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services as follows: (A) $17,200,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Clínica Monseñor Oscar A. Romero’s Centro Alaxik. (B) $1,500,000 to the County of Ventura for the Westminster Free Clinic. (C) $5,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for improving health outcomes for San Fernando Valley patients of the North East Valley Health Corporation. (D) $2,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Westside Infant and Family Network. (E) $1,000,000 to the County of Yolo, Department of Health and Human Services, for the Yolo Crisis Nursery. (F) $1,000,000 to the County of Orange for Be Well OC. (2) To be allocated by the State Department of Public Health as follows: (A) $7,800,000 to the County of Los Angeles Department of Public Health for the Via Care’s Cesar Chavez Health Center. (B) $200,000 to the County of Santa Clara for the Santa Clara County Health Equity Agenda. (C) $500,000 to the County of San Diego, District 2 for the purchase of the San Ysidro Health Rural Mobile Unit. (D) $10,000,000 to the County of Kern for Adventist Health AIS Cancer Center, Bakersfield for the Rural Cancer Center Expansion. (E) $15,000,000 for a one-time grant program to strengthen testing for infectious agents in hospital emergency departments, including, but not limited to, HIV, hepatitis C, and syphilis. Funds shall be available for administration and evaluation and technical assistance for the program. Grants to hospitals to strengthen infectious agent testing shall be awarded to cover screening and navigation services to access treatment and prevention in high-volume, mid-volume, and lower-volume emergency departments in both urban and rural areas. (F) $10,000,000 to Cayenne Wellness Center to support education, outreach, mental health, and care-coordinated services for individuals with sickle cell disease. (3) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services as follows: (A) $5,000,000 to the City of Oxnard for the Casa Aliento and Del Playa Inn Homeless Shelters. (B) $5,000,000 for the purchase of the land and construction of a new food bank, administered by Food Share Ventura. (C) $200,000 to the County of Ventura Human Services Agency for the Kids and Families Together to hire a limited term fundraising professional to focus on obtaining funding from corporate, foundation, and faith-based organizations. (D) $2,500,000 for the Rancho Cordova Food Locker to upgrade existing buildings and food storage areas, as well as create a safe, secure, and accessible satellite food distribution center for the unhoused community. (E) $3,000,000 for Project Angel Food: Facility/kitchen Expansion. (F) $1,800,000 to the City of Alameda for the Community Assessment Response and Engagement (CARE) Team. (G) $1,500,000 to Los Angeles Regional Food Bank for the West Valley Food Pantry Community Center Addition. (H) $600,000 to the Karsh Family Social Service Center capital projects. (4) To be allocated by the State Department of Developmental Services as follows: (A) $2,000,000 to the California Policy Center for Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities to develop innovative strategies to support adults with developmental disabilities in employment. (B) $1,000,000 to Easterseals Southern California for autistic care and programs. (5) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services as follows: (A) $2,158,000 to the Luminarias Institute for Mental Health programming. (B) $390,000 to Penny Lane Centers for Substance Use Disorder and Co-occurring Disorder Services. (C) $400,000 to the San Fernando Valley Community Mental Health Services for Mental Health Services. (D) $1,500,000 to the City of Huntington Beach for the Mobile Crisis Response Program. (E) $277,000 to Valley Community Healthcare for training for new providers. (F) $4,000,000 to the Children’s Hospital of Orange County (CHOC) for supporting mental health services. (6) $50,000 to Hands4Hope Los Angeles for the Pandemic Recovery Program. (7) $250,000 to Exceptional Minds for a Job Preparation Programming for people on the autism spectrum. (8) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections, $120,000 to Soledad Enrichment Action for a financial literacy and entrepreneurship program for at-risk youth. (9) $277,000 to Valley Community Healthcare for training for new providers. (10) $2,500,000 to the City of Monterey for the Community Human Services' Shuman Heart House for building renovations, furnishings, and equipment. (11) $3,000,000 to the Inner Circle Children’s Advocacy Center for programming services for abused children. (12) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $10,100,000 to the Jewish Family Service Los Angeles for Holocaust Survivor Assistance. (13) To be allocated by the Department of Public Health, $25,000 to the County of San Mateo for the District Wide: Peninsula Humane Society: X-Ray Machine Upgrade. (14) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services as follows: (A) $100,000 to the County of San Mateo for the District Wide: Planned Parenthood Mar Monte: Purchase of a Hysteroscope for the San Mateo Health Center. (B) $1,000,000 to the City of Fresno for Reproductive Health for the Central Valley: Planned Parenthood Mar Monte health center renovations. (C) $1,000,000 to the City of Buena Park for the KCS Health Center to purchase three mobile health clinics. (D) $3,000,000 for the Los Angeles Kheir Clinic. (E) $6,500,000 to the Richmond Area Multi-Services Inc. (Rams, Inc.) for building acquisition for clinics. (F) $5,000,000 to the County of Modoc for Modoc Hospital Legacy Debt Elimination. (G) $4,000,000 to the Loma Linda University Children's Hospital for the Trauma-Informed Medical Home Model for Victimized Children Capacity. (H) $5,000,000 to the County of Madera to facilitate the reopening of operations at Madera Community Hospital. (15) To be allocated by the State Department of Public Health, $3,000,000 to the City of Martinez for the Feet First Foundation. (16) $5,000,000 to the State Council on Developmental Disabilities for implementation of the Supported Decisionmaking Technical Assistance Program (SDM-TAP), as follows: (A) $2,000,000 for the establishment and operation of the SDM-TAP within the State Council on Developmental Disabilities. (B) $3,000,000 to be awarded in grant funding. (17) $500,000 to be allocated by the California Department of Aging to the County of San Mateo for the Police Interaction with Dementia Patients Pilot. (j) VETERANS (1) To be allocated by the Department of Veterans Affairs as follows: (A) $90,000 to the United Way of San Joaquin County/Woody Williams Foundation designated for the Gold Star Families Memorial Monument at the new San Joaquin County VA Clinic, located at 6505 South Manthey Road, French Camp, California, 95231. Any excess funds for this Gold Star Families Memorial Monument Project will be used to further the mission to honor and serve Gold Star Families and the legacy of their loved ones who have paid the ultimate sacrifice. (B) $2,700,000 to the City of Palmdale Department of Neighborhood Services for the Homes 4 Families Housing Construction in a Veteran Enriched Neighborhood. (C) $200,000 for the City of Elk Grove for the American Legion Post 233 Elk Grove to provide support and services to the community and veterans. (2) $1,000,000 for the Cayucos Veterans Hall Renovations. (k) OTHER COMMUNITY SERVICES (1) $2,000,000 to the County of Santa Clara for the Santa Clara County Youth Climate Initiative in the Office of Sustainability. (2) To be allocated by the California Department of Education, $2,200,000 to the Silicon Valley Education Foundation for Youth programming. (3) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $5,000,000 to Conga Kids for arts and education programming. (4) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $5,200,000 to the Entrepreneur Education, Inc., to support the primary program objectives of the EECI Business Opportunity Center. (5) $500,000 to the San Mateo County Union Community Alliance. (6) $1,000,000 to the City of South San Francisco for the North San Mateo County Economic Advancement Center. (7) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $2,100,000 to the City of Bellflower for the Bellflower Youth & Senior Center. (8) $5,200,000 to Angels for Sight for renovating Angels for Sight’s new Long Beach vision care center. (9) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $10,000,000 to Choice in Aging for construction costs at the aging in place campus. (10) $5,000,000 to the County of Yolo to support Knight’s Landing Park, Vic Fazio Wildlife Area, Crisis Nursery expansion and the Underserved Farmer’s Cooperative. (11) $250,000 to El Proyecto del Barrio for a Digital Display system. (12) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $1,500,000 to the City of Los Angeles, Office of the City Clerk, for the Watts Empowerment Center to support the planning, design and renovation of the 4-Acre arts and culture campus. (13) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $1,500,000 to the San Bernardino Community Service Center, Inc. for Immigration Services. (14) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $700,000 to the Neighborhood Legal Services of Los Angeles for the research on community-driven equitable development in communities experiencing poverty in the San Fernando Valley. (15) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $2,000,000 to Skirball for refugee services, Spanish translation of materials, and exhibit. (16) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development, $9,000,000 to ETTA for capital outlay projects. (17) $1,000,000 to the Chicano Latino Youth Leadership Project (CLYLP) for the CLYLP expansion to the Inland Empire. (18) $1,740,000 to the Huerta del Valle Community Garden for Huerta del Valle program support. (19) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $8,500,000 to One OC for programming improvements to serve communities historically underrepresented in business ownership. (20) $5,000,000 to Access California Services for capital costs for a new building. (21) $2,000,000 to La Familia Counseling Services for capital costs of Opportunity Center. (22) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $2,500,000 to the City of Corona for the Renovation of Innovation and Economic Center. (23) $25,000,000 to the City of Alhambra for the construction of the Alhambra community center. (24) $9,000,000 to the City of Santa Ana for the Modernization of the Santa Ana Civic Center (SACC). (25) To be allocated by Board of State and Community Corrections, $500,000 to the County of Sacramento for the Sacramento Regional Family Justice Center. (26) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation: (A) $400,000 for the Dream Play Yard for the Boys & Girls Club of Laguna Beach to address physical, socio-emotional, and academic well-being with more PLAY and learning for local youth. (B) $1,949,950 for the Boys and Girls Club of Huntington Valley for alternative fuel school bus replacement and facility repairs and upgrades. (C) $1,400,000 to the City of Vacaville for the Vacaville Neighborhood Boys and Girls Club land acquisition and capital projects. (D) $1,000,000 to the Boys and Girls Club of Wilmington, Safer Wilmington Initiative. (27) To be allocated by the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander American Affairs, $1,000,000 to Ben Em Dang Co Ta Foundation for the Anti-Asian Hate Campaign/Project. (28) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $1,000,000 to Gold House for Fighting Anti-AAPI Hate and enabling socioeconomic opportunities. (29) To be allocated by the State Department of Developmental Services, $300,000 to the City of Elk Grove for Project R.I.D.E. (30) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation, $200,000 for the Lakewood Family YMCA Capital Improvements. (31) $3,000,000 to the Marin City Community Services District to remodel the community center. (32) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency, $5,200,000 to the City of Long Beach for the Wrigley Greenbelt restoration and Multi-Service Center expansion and improvements. (33) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $5,000,000 to the City of Signal Hill for the renovation of the Signal Hill outdoor amphitheater. (34) $800,000 to the City of Sacramento for Street Soccer USA Sacramento. (35) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $3,000,000 to the County of Sacramento Department of General Services Mather Community Campus Human Assistance Facility. (36) $2,500,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Los Angeles Street Car “Grow the Grid” program. (37) $2,000,000 to the City of Sacramento for South Sacramento Youth Programming providing grants to South Sac community-based organizations. (38) $2,000,000 for the City of Fullerton for the Women’s Transitional Living Center to address impact of COVID-19 on Domestic Violence and Human Trafficking Victims. (39) $2,000,000 to the Community Youth Center to complete the Richmond Community Center. (40) $2,200,000 for Camp Fire Angeles Capital Improvements. (41) $2,000,000 to the County of San Mateo for the Pescadero Community Plaza Project. Funding provided in this paragraph is available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2028. (42) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $4,000,000 for the Watts Tower Arts Center Campus Renovation. (43) $3,700,000 to the YMCA of Greater Long Beach for the Los Altos YMCA Renovation and Construction projects. (44) $4,500,000 to the County of San Bernardino for the Bloomington Animal Shelter and enhance services at the new shelter facility by offering onsite veterinary care, administering animal behavior assessments, and expanding its adoption and volunteer programs. (45) $25,000,000 to the City of Riverside for the Cesar Chavez Community Center Renovations. (46) $5,500,000 to the City of Torrance for the Community Resource and Response Center. (47) $5,000,000 to the Community Development Finance, in partnership with the City of Oakland for the Teachers Rooted in Oakland (TRiO) Program. (48) To be allocated by the State Department of Social Services, $3,000,000 for the All in Eats/Food Hub. (49) $3,000,000 to the San Diego LGBT Center for the LGBT Center expansion planning and predevelopment and for housing, case management, resource, and capacity building. (50) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, $2,000,000 to the City of San Diego for the development of a County of a San Diego Black Chamber of Commerce. (51) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections, $750,000 to the City of San Diego for Your Safe Place – A Family Justice Center. (52) $10,000,000 to the County of Orange to expedite the completion of an urgently needed Behavioral Health Families and Children’s Campus, which will deliver coordinated mental health services, support, and resources to children and their family members. (53) $19,000,000 to the City of Colton for Community Development Projects. (54) $8,000,000 to the City of Fremont for the Central Park Community Center project. (55) $1,700,000 to the City of San Diego to work with San Diego area schools to support the needs of refugee students. (56) $3,000,000 to InConcert Sierra for renovations to Crown Point Community Center. (57) $250,000 to Levon and Hasmig Tavilian for support, maintenance, computer equipment, and supplies. (58) To be allocated by the Department of Health Care Services, $850,000 to the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments for mobile crisis pilot program. (59) To be allocated by the Department of Public Health, $100,000 for the Burbank Community YMCA for Social Impact Center for programing and support. (60) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $250,000 to BAYMEC Community Foundation for community education, outreach, and services that support the LGBTQ+ community and to preserve and promote the Silicon Valley’s LGBTQ+ history. (61) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services, $1,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles for the Jenesse Center purchase and refurbishment of facility for domestic violence survivors. (62) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development, $1,000,000 to the City of Burlingame for the Burlingame Plaza project. (63) To be allocated by the Office of Planning and Research, $1,000,000 for the Asian Pacific Youth Leadership Project. (64) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $500,000 to the City of Hawthorne for Hawthorne Senior Center infrastructure improvements. (65) To be allocated by the State Department of Health Care Services, $5,000,000 for Chinese Hospital, located in San Francisco. (66) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $3,000,000 for 490 Brannan Kularts Site Acquisition. (67) To be allocated by the California State University, $2,500,000 for San Francisco State Cross Cultural Center. (68) $2,000,000 for United Playaz Youth Center Acquisition. (69) To be allocated by the State Library, $850,000 for the Chinese Historical Society Infrastructure Improvements. (70) $200,000 to the Armenian Bar Association for supporting the increased activity in pro bono tenant relief clinics throughout the County of Los Angeles. (71) $200,000 to Homenetmen Hrashq for supporting services for disabled youth athletes. (72) $350,000 to Ararat Home of Los Angeles campus for the purposes of purchasing a new facility and defraying costs for running the Ararat-Eskijian Museum that is located on the campus. (73) $250,000 to Camp AREV for capital improvements and new facility construction. (74) $1,000,000 for the Vivalon Healthy Aging Campus. (75) $750,000 to AGBY Manoogian-Demirdjian School to assist in capital improvements and classroom reconstruction. (l) GENERAL GOVERNMENT (1) To be allocated by the Department of Technology as follows: (A) $4,000,000 to the City of Gardena for the Digital Divide to design and deploy a fiber corridor to connect residents, small businesses, schools, community facilities, and other broadband capabilities in all of the city’s six parks. (B) $200,000 to the City of Duarte for Broadband Access. (C) $1,800,000 to the City of Newark for Broadband Master Planning. (D) $500,000 to the Town of Danville for a Fiber Optic Interconnected Network for Town Facilities. (2) $20,000,000 to the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG) to reduce the outstanding bond balance of the SR-125 Fund to support efforts to eliminate bond debt by 2027. (3) To be allocated by the Exposition Park as follows: (A) $10,000,000 for the California African American Museum. (4) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $500,000 for the Capitol Radio equipment replacement and upgrades. (5) $300,000 to the County of Butte for the Flower Bowl Demolition. (6) To be allocated by the Board of State and Community Corrections, $100,000 to the City of Santee for Rise Up Industries. (7) $700,000 to the City of Citrus Heights for the Citrus Heights Gateway Activation Plan (GAP) Project. (8) To be allocated by the California Department of Aging, $1,200,000 for the new Self Help for the Elderly Sunset Senior Center construction costs. (9) To be allocated by the Office of Emergency Services, $2,500,000 for the County of Madera for Infrastructure. (10) To be allocated by the Office of Business and Economic Development, as follows: (A) $1,500,000 to the City of Fresno for support of the Neighborhood Industry’s efforts to purchase and renovate their headquarters. (B) $10,000,000 for the California Entrepreneurship Capital in the Community Initiative. (C) $5,000,000 to the County of Contra Costa for the one-time start up funding for the Green Empowerment Zone for the Northern Waterfront Area of Contra Costa County. (11) $5,400,000 to the City of Culver City for Transportation Electrification Infrastructure Electrification. (12) $8,000,000 to the City of Redlands for the construction of their University of Redlands Village. (13) To be allocated by the Department of Justice, $500,000 to the Girl Scouts of San Diego County for background check costs. (14) To be allocated by the California Arts Council, $3,000,000 to the County of San Diego for the Partnership for the Advancement of New Americans for permanent Refugee and Cultural Hub building acquisition. (15) $3,300,000 to the City of San Diego for the San Diego Urban Sustainability Coalition for construction of a light industrial office complex in a historically underinvested community. (16) $4,500,000 to the City of Santee for the completion of the new Santee Community Center. (m) LABOR (1) To be allocated by the California Workforce Development Board as follows: (A) $500,000 to the County of San Mateo for the Regional: San Mateo County Union Community Alliance: San Mateo Trades Introduction Program. (B) $3,000,000 to the County of Fresno for the ValleyBuild/Fresno Regional Workforce Development Board. (C) $3,400,000 for Workforce Development and Exploration in Pomona. (D) $10,000,000 for the San Diego Workforce Partnership. (E) $8,000,000 for a grant to the Kern Community College District for the Farmworker Institute of Education & Leadership Development (FIELD) for the acquisition and remodel of a facility to act both as FIELD’s Headquarters and offer workforce development programs, education services, and temporary housing. (F) $2,000,000 to the County of Sacramento Office of Education for academic and extracurricular programs and outdoor learning experiences at Camp Winthers; new Construction/Building Trades pathway. (G) $2,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles for the Los Angeles Cleantech Incubator (LACI) to expand workforce development and cleantech innovation pilots, and advance zero emission energy solutions in disadvantaged communities. (H) $5,000,000 to the SF Market to support San Francisco's economic and artistic workforce in the Southeastern Corridor neighborhoods of Bayview-Hunters Point. (I) $1,700,000 to The Box Shop to support San Francisco's economic and artistic workforce in the Southeastern Corridor neighborhoods of Bayview-Hunters Point. (J) $750,000 to fund a study and development of model plan for worker wellness centers for transit agencies throughout the state. (2) To be allocated by the Employment Training Panel as follows: (A) $1,000,000 to the City of Chino, Chino City Council for the Chino Valley Chamber of Commerce for the Upskill Chino Valley to expand services. SEC. 3. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2022 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2022 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 43 of the Statutes of 2022 (Senate Bill No. 154). (b) Chapter 45 of the Statutes of 2022 (Assembly Bill No. 178). (c) Chapter 249 of the Statutes of 2022 (Assembly Bill No. 179). (d) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (e) Chapter 33 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 103). (f) Chapter 189 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 104). (g) Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 105). (h) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 106). (i) Chapter 996 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 158). SEC. 4. Section 19.561 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 19.561. (a) (1) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities related to natural resources and environmental protection. (2) For allocations in this section that include a designated state entity, the entity shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the paragraphs following each designation. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. (3) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. (4) If an item number for the appropriate department for a state entity does not exist, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, the Department of Finance may create an item number for this purpose. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph. (6) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of allocating authority to a different state entity to facilitate the expenditure of the funds for the intended legislative purpose. Any state entity that allocates funds may also, in consultation with the Department of Finance, use an alternative local fiscal agent that is not identified in this section instead of the fiscal agent designated in this section if necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. Any change to the allocating state entity or fiscal agent made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing at least 30 days, or no sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine, prior to the change. It is the intent of the Legislature to revise this section during the 2023–24 fiscal year to reflect any changes necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. (7) Unless otherwise specified in this section, funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2025, and expenditure until June 30, 2027. (8) Unless otherwise specified, the funds appropriated in this section shall not be disbursed for any project prior to September 30, 2023. Future legislation may, but is not required to, specify further details concerning the manner of disbursement of these funds. (9) Funding provided in this section shall not be used for a purpose subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. If the Department of Finance determines that any allocation would be considered an appropriation for that purpose, the funding shall not be allocated, and the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of that finding. (10) The amounts specified in subdivisions (b) through (j), inclusive, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (b) To be allocated by the Department of Parks and Recreation as follows: (1) $400,000 to the City of Modesto, for the Awesome Spot Playground. (2) $3,500,000 to the City of San Diego, for the Memorial Community Park Sports Field Lighting Project. (3) $500,000 to the City of Delano, for the City of Delano Parks Rejuvenation. (4) $300,000 to the Buttonwillow Recreation and Park District, for the Buttonwillow Recreation and Park District. (5) $2,000,000 to the City of Bakersfield, for the MLK Jr. Park Rehabilitation Project. (6) $1,000,000 for the Mt. Diablo State Park, Mitchell Canyon Entrance, for the Education Center. (7) $1,500,000 to the Orinda Union School District, for the Conservation of Wagner Ranch Nature Area, Orinda Union School District. (8) $750,000 to the City of Ojai, for the City of Ojai: Construction of Sarzotti Park infrastructure. (9) $500,000 to the City of Del Mar, for the Sand Replenishment Project. (10) $2,000,000 to the Rancho Coastal Humane Society, for the Rancho Coastal Humane Society Expansion and Reconstruction Project. (11) $600,000 to the Port of San Diego and City of Carlsbad, for the EV and Portable Solar Powered Charging Stations Installation. (12) $250,000 to the City of San Diego, for the Lifeguard Northern Garage Feasibility Study. (13) $500,000 to the City of Adelanto, for Bellflower Park. (14) $260,000 to the City of Palmdale, for the 47th St. and Ave. R-4 Pocket Park. (15) $1,500,000 to the Los Angeles Regional Open Space and Affordable Housing (LA ROSAH) Collaborative, for the Taylor Yard Equity Strategy at the Los Angeles River. (16) $1,000,000 to the County of Marin, for the Golden Gate Village Playground Upgrades. (17) $500,000 to the City of El Monte, for the City of El Monte Pioneer Park. (18) $35,000 to the City of San Gabriel, for La Casa de San Gabriel Community Center. (19) $100,000 to the City of Burbank, for the Burbank Youth Center Renovation. (20) $1,500,000 to the City of Burbank, for the McCambridge Swimming Pool Renovation. (21) $933,000 to the City of Glendale, for the Fremont Park Renovation. (22) $933,000 to Discovery Cube LA, for the STEM Walk and Ride Trails Project. (23) $1,000,000 to the City of Santa Maria, for the Santa Maria Sports Complex. (24) $425,000 to the City of Buellton, for the City of Buellton Santa Ynez Regional Trail. (25) $750,000 to the City of Goleta, for the City of Goleta Stow Grove Park Playground. (26) $425,000 to the City of Folsom Parks & Recreation Department, for the Johnny Cash Trail Art Experience Master Plan – Cash’s Pick No. 2. (27) $2,000,000 to the Rancho Simi Recreation and Park District, for the Rancho Simi Community Pool Renovation. (28) $500,000 to the Moorpark College Foundation, for the Moorpark Amphitheater. (29) $500,000 to the Rancho Los Cerritos and Rancho Los Alamitos, for deferred maintenance and capital projects. (30) $750,000 to the City of Tustin, for the City of Tustin Legacy Park Improvements. (31) $5,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles, to support programs and planning for the benefit of the Southeast Los Angeles County community in preparation for the SELA Cultural Arts Center development. (32) $2,700,000 to the City of South Gate, for the City of South Gate capital outlay. (33) $2,700,000 to the City of Lakewood, for the City of Lakewood capital outlay. (34) $2,700,000 to the City of Bellflower, for the City of Bellflower capital outlay. (35) $1,850,000 to the City of Lynwood, for the City of Lynwood capital outlay. (36) $1,850,000 to the City of Huntington Park, for the City of Huntington Park capital outlay. (37) $1,850,000 to the City of Paramount, for the City of Paramount capital outlay. (38) $750,000 to the City of Maywood, for the City of Maywood capital outlay. (39) $600,000 to the County of Los Angeles, for the unincorporated community of Walnut Park capital outlay. (40) $1,000,000 to the City of Fountain Valley, for the Fountain Valley Universally Accessible Playground. (41) $1,000,000 for the Angel Island Immigration Station Foundation. (42) $3,000,000 to the City of San Pablo, for the San Pablo Area for Recreation and Community Space (SPARC) Project. (43) $500,000 to the East Bay Regional Park District, for the Restoration of Wildcat Creek at Brooks Road. (44) $2,000,000 for the City of Gardena for renovation of the Mas Fukai Park building structure. (45) $3,200,000 for the City of La Puente for construction of the La Puente Activity Center and recreation facilities. (46) $6,400,000 for the City of Santa Fe Springs for renovation of the Regional Aquatics Center building. (47) $660,000 for the City of Diamond Bar for playground, restroom, and site improvements at the Maple Hill Park. (48) $1,000,000 for the City of Sacramento for park and community improvement projects. (49) $1,000,000 for the City of Elk Grove for community improvements. (50) $1,000,000 for the City of San Diego for support of the La Jolla Streetscape Project. (51) $1,300,000 for the San Dieguito River Park Joint Powers Authority for the Reach the Beach Trail and Western Gateway Project. (52) $150,000 for Street Soccer USA for restrooms. (53) $100,000 for the County of San Diego for support of the Pillars of the Community garden and gathering space. (54) $300,000 for the City of Millbrae for capital improvements to the Bayside Manor and Marina Vista Parks. (55) $500,000 for the County of San Mateo for creation of Ohlone State Historic Trail Markers. (56) $1,400,000 for San Dieguito River Park Joint Powers Authority for completion of the Asuna Segment of the Coast to Crest Trail. (57) $3,000,000 for the City of Gardena for the Rowley Park Gymnasium Renovation. (58) $400,000 for the Soledad Mission Recreation District for deferred maintenance and updating systems. (59) $1,000,000 for the City of Parlier for Indoor/Outdoor Regional Sports Park. (60) $1,000,000 for the City of Kerman for the completion of the Hart Ranch Community Park project. (61) $350,000 for the City of Reedley for additional playing fields at the City’s Sports Complex. (62) $500,000 for the City of Madera for trail system upgrades for the Lions Town and Country Park. (63) $310,000 for the County of Merced for a community park in Santa Nella. (64) $1,250,000 for Sonoma County Regional Parks for the Larson Park Renovation project and wildfire mitigation in Sonoma Valley. (65) $1,000,000 for the Heart of Los Angeles (HOLA) for support of a Placemaking Initiative at Lafayette Park. (66) $5,000,000 for the East Bay Regional Park District for improvements to Roddy Ranch. (67) $2,000,000 for the City of Paramount for support for the West Santa Ana Branch Bikeway Project Trail. (68) (a) $1,000,000 for the City of Santa Paula for improvements to the Santa Paula Creek Sports Park. (b) $1,000,000 for the County of Ventura for the Teen Center at Saticoy Park. (69) $1,500,000 for the Great Redwood Trail Agency (GRTA) for trail construction, community outreach, and pre-trail development activities. (70) $2,000,000 for the Pacific Symphony Education and Community Enrichment Programs for expansion of music programs serving vulnerable communities. (71) $300,000 for the City of Laguna Beach for the construction of a dog play area at Moulton Meadows Park. (72) $350,000 for the City of Huntington Beach to support the Huntington Beach Ride Circuit Shuttle Program. (73) $1,225,000 for the City of Laguna Beach for the rehabilitation of the Moss Street Beach Access. (74) $1,000,000 for the Play Equity Fund for design and development of park, recreation, and open space improvements on county owned land adjacent to Yvonne Braithwaite Burke Sports Complex. (75) $2,000,000 for the City of La Habra for the Vista Grande park development project. (76) $2,000,000 for the Hesperia Recreation and Park District for relocation and construction of a modernized corporation yard facility. (77) $400,000 for the City of Los Angeles for the development of an equestrian trail master plan in Northeast San Fernando Valley. (78) $500,000 to the County of Ventura, for the development of the Meiners Oaks park. (c) To be allocated by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery as follows: (1) $240,000 to the City of Adelanto, for the Tire Collection Bounty Program. (d) To be allocated by the State Air Resources Board as follows: (1) $500,000 to the Safe Passage Youth Foundation, for the Disadvantaged Community Electric Vehicle Pilot Project. (2) $250,000 to the City of La Mesa, for the City of La Mesa Lemon Avenue Public Parking Lot Electric Vehicle Charging Stations. (3) $400,000 to the City of La Mesa, for the La Mesa Public Works Yard Solar Panel and Battery Storage Project. (e) To be allocated by the Department of Food and Agriculture as follows: (1) $500,000 to the City of Sacramento, for the Meadowview Community Farmers Market. (2) $2,123,000 to the Community Alliance with Family Farmers, for the Community Alliance with Family Farmers Emergency Funding. (3) $314,000 to the Penny Lane Centers, for the Penny Lane Centers/Abbey Road - Affordable Housing Renovation for Transition Age Youth. (f) To be allocated by the California Energy Commission as follows: (1) $700,000 to the City of El Segundo, for EV Charging Stations. (2) $1,000,000 to the City of Daly City Department of Public Works, for the Daly City Energy Storage. (g) To be allocated by the Natural Resources Agency as follows: (1) $1,000,000 to the City of Capitola, for the Community Center Renovation. (2) $780,000 to the Natural Resources Agency, Blue Ribbon Committee for Rehabilitation of Clear Lake, for the Water Quality Evaluations, Data Management, and Groundwater Evaluations for the Rehabilitation of Clear Lake. (3) $1,100,000 to the University of California, Davis Tahoe Environmental Research Center (TERC), for the Hypolimnetic Oxygenation Pilot Project to Revitalize Clear Lake. (4) $2,000,000 to the City of Fresno, for the Radio Bilingue: Building of a new public radio headquarters and programming. (5) $1,500,000 to the County of Ventura, for the Ventura County Pet Shelter. (6) $500,000 to the City of Campbell, for the City of Campbell: ADA Facility Improvements. (7) $1,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles, Department of Parks and Recreation, for the Puente Hills Landfill Park. (8) $1,000,000 to the City of Pico Rivera, for the City of Pico Rivera’s First Dog Park. (9) $250,000 to the City of Walnut, for the Snow Creek Park. (10) $250,000 to the City of Diamond Bar, for the Heritage Park. (11) $250,000 to the YMCA of Greater Whittier Uptown Family Center, for the YMCA of Greater Whittier Uptown Family Center. (12) $1,000,000 to the City of Palmdale, for the Facility for Salva. (13) $3,063,000 to the County of Riverside, for TruEvolution for the launch of the Inland Empire LGBTQ Resource Center and grant initiatives, including services in southwest Riverside County, including Menifee, Lake Elsinore, and Norco. (14) $250,000 to the City of Vista, for the AVO Playhouse Rehabilitation & ADA Upgrades Project. (15) $1,200,000 to the YMCA of Metropolitan Los Angeles, for Community Empowerment Hubs at the Mid Valley YMCA and the West Valley YMCA. (16) $500,000 to CounterPulse. (17) $500,000 for the Central American Resource Center (CARECEN-SF) New 1117 Market St. Community Center Site. (18) $2,000,000 to the City of Monrovia, for the Restoration of Monrovia Canyon Park. (19) $1,500,000 to the City of La Verne, for upgrades to Las Flores Park. (20) $2,000,000 to the County of Los Angeles, for the renovation of two Armenian Youth Federation camps. (21) $800,000 to Heal the Bay, for the Pacific Palisades Creek Daylight Storm Water Restoration Project. (22) $1,500,000 to the City of San Jose, for the Lake Cunningham Water Quality and Shoreline Improvements. (23) $1,000,000 to the City of Newark, for the Newark Resource Center. (24) $1,000,000 to the City of Fremont, for the Multi-Service Community Center at Central Park. (25) $2,000,000 to the City of Avalon, for the Cabrillo Mole Phase II. (26) $5,000,000 to the City of Sacramento, for various Community Reinvestment projects. (27) $1,350,000 to the City of Sacramento, for Aging Infrastructure (Grass fields at Garcia Bend Park). (28) $2,718,000 to the City of Downey, for the Columbia Memorial Space Center 2nd Building Expansion. (29) $374,050 to the City of San Mateo, for the Bayside Manor and Marina Vista Park Upgrades. (30) $500,000 to the City of Rocklin, for the City of Rocklin Sunset Whitney Connector Bridge. (31) $1,200,000 to the City of Artesia Park, for Facility Improvements/Community Center Roofing. (32) $2,000,000 to the City of Artesia, for the Artesia Botanical Gardens and Educational Feature. (33) $5,000,000 to the City of San Bernardino, for the Seccombe Lake Park Project in City of San Bernardino. capital improvements. (34) $3,200,000 to the City of Rancho Cucamonga, for the First Responders 9/11 Memorial. (35) $2,000,000 to the City of Redlands, for the Museum of Redlands Construction Completion. (36) $3,000,000 to the City of Fontana, for the Fontana Downtown Plan. (37) $1,924,000 to the Fairplex, for the Career and Technical Education Center. (38) $3,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the Casa 0101. (39) $500,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the Chinatown Service Center. (40) $171,000 to the Community Integration Services, Inc., for the Community Integration Services, Inc. Infrastructure and Technology Upgrades. (41) $279,000 to the SRD Straightening Reins, for the SRD - Straightening Reins: Solar Panels & Extreme Heat Protection Roof. (42) $160,000 to the Santa Clarita Valley Boys & Girls Club, for the Santa Clarita Valley Boys & Girls Club Infrastructure Upgrades. (43) $1,100,000 to the City of Madera, for the City of Madera – Lions Town & Country Park. (44) $8,000,000 to the County of Fresno, for the City of Mendota Community Center. (45) $3,500,000 to the County of Merced, for the Franklin-Beachwood Public Park. (46) $3,100,000 to the City of Stockton, for the City of Stockton – Redevelopment on the Miracle Mile: Public Safety/Maintenance Substation/Parking. (47) $2,500,000 to the City of San Diego, for the San Diego River Park Foundation. (48) $195,000 to the City of San Diego, for the City of San Diego “The Black Family” Statue Restoration Project. (49) $1,500,000 to the City of Vallejo, for the Vallejo Marina Seawall Rehabilitation Project. (50) $250,000 to the Anderson Valley Community Services District, for the Anderson Valley Skate Park. (51) $1,250,000 to the Dr. Huey P. Newton Center for Research & Action, for the Dr. Huey P. Newton Center for Research & Action (Black Panther Party). (52) $500,000 for the City of San Diego for Balboa Park Spreckels Organ Project. (53) $5,600,000 for the City of San Diego/Fleet Science Center for Fleet Center exhibit space. (54) $200,000 for the City of Los Altos for infrastructure upgrades for greening and electrifying downtown Los Altos. (55) $5,000,000 for the San Joaquin Community Foundation for establishment of an urban forest program. (56) $1,000,000 for the City of Santa Cruz for support of repairs and improvements to the West Cliff coastal recreation corridor. (57) $150,000 for the Center for Coastal Marine Sciences for baseline assessment of the Morro Bay Wind Energy Area’s biological wildlife and ecosystem conditions. (58) $750,000 for the County of San Luis Obispo for support of staffing resources for offshore wind development. (59) $500,000 for the Santa Barbara Land Trust for acquisition, restoration, and ongoing improvements of the Gaviota Overlook in the Arroyo Hondo Preserve. (60) $500,000 for Heal the Oceans to conduct a geological study in Summerland, California. (61) $1,625,000 for the Santa Barbara Community Environmental Council for the support of the Santa Barbara County Regional Climate Collaborative. (62) $503,000 for the Nickels Soil Lab for the support of lab operations. (63) $2,500,000 for the City of Los Alamitos for infrastructure repairs and improvements. (64) $200,000 to Calaveras County Animal Services for facilities improvements. (65) $1,000,000 for the City of San Diego for facility upgrades of the World Beat Center in Balboa Park. (h) To be allocated by Exposition Park as follows: (1) $500,000, for the Renovation of Al Malaikah Shrine Auditorium. (2) $1,000,000 to the California Science Center Foundation, for the California Science Center Foundation Air and Space Center. (i) To be allocated by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection as follows: (1) $1,250,000 for the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for an Urban Forestry in Schools Grant Program. (j) To be allocated by the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy as follows: (1) $6,500,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for acquisition and conservation of publicly accessible parkland in Calabasas and unincorporated Topanga. (2) $2,500,000 for the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for support of planning, scoping, and investment in the Sepulveda Basin. SEC. 5. Section 19.564 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 19.564. (a) (1) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities related to housing. (2) For allocations in this section that include a designated state entity, the entity shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the paragraphs following each designation. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. (3) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. (4) If an item number for the appropriate department for a state entity does not exist, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, the Department of Finance may create an item number for this purpose. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph. (6) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of allocating authority to a different state entity to facilitate the expenditure of the funds for the intended legislative purpose. Any state entity that allocates funds may also, in consultation with the Department of Finance, use an alternative local fiscal agent that is not identified in this section instead of the fiscal agent designated in this section if necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. Any change to the allocating state entity or fiscal agent made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing at least 30 days, or no sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine, prior to the change. It is the intent of the Legislature to revise this section during the 2023–24 fiscal year to reflect any changes necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. (7) Unless otherwise specified in this section, funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2025, and expenditure until June 30, 2027. (8) Unless otherwise specified, the funds appropriated in this section shall not be disbursed for any project prior to September 30, 2023. Future legislation may, but is not required to, specify further details concerning the manner of disbursement of these funds. (9) Funding provided in this section shall not be used for a purpose subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. If the Department of Finance determines that any allocation would be considered an appropriation for that purpose, the funding shall not be allocated, and the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of that finding. (10) The amounts specified in subdivisions (b), inclusive, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (b) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development as follows: (1) $225,000 to the City of West Sacramento, for the Recovery Café in West Sacramento. (2) $1,250,000 to the City of Half Moon Bay, for the City of Half Moon Bay: Coastside Farmworker Housing Development. (3) $1,250,000 to the County of San Mateo, for the County of San Mateo: Coastside Farmworker Housing Development. (4) $1,250,000 to the City of Alameda, for the Safe Parking and Homeless Day Center at Alameda Point. (5) $500,000 to the City of Culver City, for the Wende Museum: Affordable Housing for Artists at Risk. (6) $1,000,000 to the City of Culver City, for the Culver City – Jubilo Village Affordable Housing Development. (7) $1,000,000 to the Inland Equity Land Trust, for Plan Adelanto. (8) $500,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the Renovations and Security Improvements at Huntington Villas. (9) $2,000,000 to the County of Sonoma, in partnership with the Sonoma County Community Development Commission (SCCDC), for the Tierra de Rosas Infrastructure Project. (10) $500,000 to the County of Tulare, for the Tulare County Homeless Housing. (11) $600,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the RV Buyback and Disposal Program. (12) $2,000,000 for the San Fernando Valley Economic Development Center by New Economics for Women. (13) $300,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles for rehabilitation at the Sieroty/Howard Johnson Homekey Site. (14) $1,000,000 to the Habitat for Humanity of Butte County, for the Habitat for Humanity of Butte County Projects. (15) $2,500,000 to the San Diego State University, for the San Diego State Imperial Valley Student Housing. (16) $2,000,000 to the Riverside County Housing Authority, for the Galilee Center Housing Shelter. (17) $1,000,000 to the City of Concord, for the Yellow Roof Foundation. (18) $1,000,000 to GLIDE, for the GLIDE Modernization Project. (19) $250,000 to the Homeless Prenatal Program, for the Homeless Prenatal Program. (20) $750,000 to the Sigma Beta Xi, Inc., for the SBX: Youth and Family Services Youth Village Project. (21) $1,000,000 to the Los Angeles County Development Agency (LACDA), for the Treehouse Leimert Park Housing Project. (22) $500,000 to the Los Angeles County Development Agency (LACDA) for the Biddy Mason South Los Angeles Mixed-Use Housing Project. (23) $500,000 to the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services, for the Los Angeles Skid Row Action Plan. (24) $2,000,000 to the City of San Jose, for the Eviction Diversion Program. (25) $200,000 to the Comite Civico Del Valle, for the Universidad Popular. (26) $750,000 to the San Diego Housing Commission, for the Homelessness Outreach Task Force. (27) $1,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles motel to housing conversion. (28) $2,500,000 to the City of San Leandro, for the Nimitz Motel acquisition and renovation. (29) $200,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles – Chatsworth Travelodge Homekey Site Safety Improvements. (30) $136,000 to the Vida Mobile Clinic, for the Vida Mobile Clinic Outreach & Medical Supplies. (31) $1,250,000 to Bridge to Home Santa Clarita Valley, for the Bridge to Home Family Housing Units & Client Service Center. (32) $1,000,000 to the City of Orange, for the City of Orange: Homeless Resource Center. (33) $1,500,000 to the City of Anaheim, for the City of Anaheim: Mobile Family Resource Center. (34) $400,000 to the City of Stockton, for the City of Stockton – Loads of Hope – Mobile Laundromat Service Vehicles for Homeless Individuals. (35) $1,435,000 to the Life Plan Humboldt, for the Life Plan Humboldt. (36) $2,500,000 for the town of Danville for implementation of the ADU Accelerator Program to grant funds to cities in Contra Costa and Alameda Counties for the creation of pre-approved permit ready accessory dwelling unit plans and an incentive program. (37) $500,000 to the City of West Hollywood for refurbishing of existing log cabin structure. (38) $5,000,000 for Stanislaus County for infrastructure projects in South Modesto. (39) $2,000,000 for the San Diego Housing Commission for predevelopment of the densification of Casa Colina Phase 1 in City Heights. (40) $2,000,000 for the City of Half Moon Bay for the planning and development of affordable housing. (41) $1,000,000 for Alta Housing for the development of senior affordable housing. (42) $5,000,000 for the City of Vista for interim and permanent support housing units. (43) $2,000,000 for the County of Fresno for design and construction costs of improvements in the communities of Cantua Creek and El Porvenir. (44) $240,000 for Habitat for Humanity Greater Fresno Area for program support. (45) $150,000 for the City of Reedley for improvements to transitional housing facility. (46) $500,000 for Hijas del Campo for construction of farmworker housing in east central Contra Costa County. (47) $150,000 for El Camino Homeless Organization for the construction of a permanent dining structure for individuals experiencing homelessness. (48) $84,000 for the City of Monterey for the lighting improvement project on Old Fisherman’s Wharf. (49) $1,000,000 for the County of Sonoma for the Casa Roseland Project. (50) $500,000 for the City of Los Angeles for the LA Family Housing to renovate interim housing units. (51) $3,000,000 for Neighborhood Legal Service of Los Angeles for the construction of the NLSLA Pacoima Justice and Job Training Center. (52) $1,100,000 to the City of Huntington Beach to support Operations of the Navigation Center for homeless individuals. (53) $3,000,000 for the City of Imperial for support of the Imperial Corridor Safety Improvements Project. (54) $2,000,000 for the Burbank Housing Corporation for affordable housing projects. (55) $2,000,000 for the City of Perris for construction of multipurpose/nutrition room at the Perris Senior Center. (56) $500,000 for the City of Riverside for local historical preservation efforts by the Civil Rights Institute of Inland Southern California. (57) $1,000,000 for the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments for purposes of homeless services and public safety support. (58) $6,500,000 for Lao Family Community Development for infrastructure and capital improvements for units for unhoused people. (59) $3,000,000 for Eden Housing for Legacy Court housing project. (60) $2,000,000 for Unity Council for support of housing and community services and a housing and community project at the site of the Ghostship Warehouse fire. (61) $2,000,000 for St. Mary’s Center for property acquisition, maintenance, and operations for transitional housing for formerly homeless seniors. (62) $2,500,000 for the Los Angeles Black Worker Center for the establishment of a justice campus in the City of Los Angeles. (63) $3,000,000 for the City of Los Angeles for siting, design and construction of structures marking and identifying historic black neighborhoods in Los Angeles. (64) $3,500,000 for the California Black Freedom Fund for support of nonprofit organizations implementing civic engagement and voter education programs. (65) $4,750,000 for the City of Los Angeles, Mayor’s Office for housing and neighborhood improvement projects in the San Fernando Valley. (66) $2,000,000 for the City of Orange for support of the Homeless Resource Center. (67) $4,000,000 for the City of Garden Grove for support of the Central Cities Navigation Center. (68) $2,500,000 for the City of Hayward for construction of the Stack Youth and Family Center Phase II. (69) $1,800,000 for the City for Santa Clara for support of Santa Clara Overnight Care locations. (70) $500,000 for the City of Fremont for support of Housing Navigation Center. (71) $1,500,000 for the City of Fremont for support of the Commercial District Wi-Fi Access Expansion Project. (72) $1,600,000 for the City of Milpitas for support of the Milpitas SMART program. (73) $1,500,000 for the National AIDS Memorial for establishment of the Center for Health and Social Justice. (74) $2,500,000 for the Southeast Asian Development Center for acquisition of a building to serve community members. (75) $1,000,000 for the City of Modesto for support of the Modesto Downtown Streets Teams. (76) $155,000 to Tuolumne County for the acquisition of property for the development of workforce housing. (77) $435,000 to the City of Turlock for parks and sewer infrastructure. SEC. 6. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2023 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 189 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 106). (f) Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 109). (g) Chapter 996 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 158). (h) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). SEC. 7. Item 2240-401 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 2240-401—Notwithstanding any other law and consistent with the provisions of Section 11.96 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024), $4,000,000 of the amount transferred from Item 2240-164-8506, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) to the Department of Housing and Community Development for the Accelerate Affordable Housing Production Project pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 11.96 of the Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (EO E 24/25-142) shall be transferred, upon order of the Department of Finance, to Schedule (2) of Item 2240-001-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). SEC. 8. Item 3125-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3125-101-6093—For local assistance, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 23,524,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 23,524,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes authorized in subdivision (i) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. 3. The amount appropriated in this item shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government with the exception of the Department of General Services for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for work authorized in subdivision (i) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. 4. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure for state operations, local assistance, or capital outlay. The term “state operations” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means work completed on land owned by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. The term “capital outlay” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means the acquisition, design, or construction of improvements on land owned, or leased, by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. SEC. 9. Item 3540-104-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3540-104-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 10,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 10,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for training center infrastructure for a fire resiliency center for the Karuk Tribe pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. SEC. 10. Item 3760-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3760-101-6093—For support of State Coastal Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 30,904,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 30,904,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes authorized in subdivision (k) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. SEC. 11. Item 3810-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3810-102-6093—For local assistance, Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 31,349,000 Schedule: (1) 2945-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 31,349,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes authorized in subdivision (j) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. SEC. 12. Item 3825-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3825-102-6093—For local assistance, San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 30,904,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 30,904,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes authorized in subdivision (l) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. SEC. 13. Item 3845-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3845-101-6093—For local assistance, San Diego River Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 23,524,000 Schedule: (1) 3140-San Diego River Conservancy ........................ 23,524,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes authorized in subdivision (m) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. SEC. 14. Item 3855-102-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3855-102-6093—For local assistance, Sierra Nevada Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 30,904,000 Schedule: (1) 3220-Sierra Nevada Conservancy ........................ 30,904,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes authorized in subdivision (h) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. SEC. 15. Item 4260-101-3156 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 4260-101-3156—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Children’s Health and Human Services Special Fund ........................ 148,100,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 148,100,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Chapter 299 of the Statutes of 2009, funds appropriated in this item may be allocated to support retroactive managed care capitation rate adjustments in the Medi-Cal program. SEC. 16. Item 5180-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 5180-001-0001—For support of State Department of Social Services ........................ 361,495,000 Schedule: (1) 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ 88,056,000 (2) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 272,980,000273,980,000 (3) 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ 69,587,00068,587,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4270-Welfare Programs ........................ −1,779,000 (5) Reimbursements to 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ −29,942,000−30,942,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4285-Disability Evaluation and Other Services ........................ −37,407,000−36,407,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from Schedule (2) of this item to Schedule (1), Program 4275019, of Item 5180-151-0001, Children and Adult Services and Licensing, in order to allow counties to perform the facilities evaluation function. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of funds from Schedule (2) of this item to Schedule (1), Program 4275019, of Item 5180-151-0001, Children and Adult Services and Licensing, in order to allow counties to perform the adoptions program function. 3. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 4. Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1778 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may use no more than 20 percent of the fees collected pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1770) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for overhead costs, facilities operation, and indirect department costs. 5. Upon request of the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services, the Director of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from Item 4260-101-0001, State Department of Health Care Services, to this item to fund the cost of the administrative hearing process associated with changes in aid or service payments in the Medi-Cal program. The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 6. Provision 1 of Items 5180-001-0270 and 5180-001-0279 also apply to this item. 7. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure and position authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-001-0001, 5180-001-0001, and reimbursements. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $6,000,000 shall be available for this purpose upon approval of the Department of Finance. The aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation increases provided under this item during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of General Fund appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 8. The State Department of Social Services may contract with a vendor to provide direct deposit to child care contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall allow for advance payment. The department is hereby authorized to provide advance payment in order to implement direct deposit to child care contractors. Contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of this provision, the State Department of Social Services is exempt from the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and from the requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code. 9. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services, to cover costs associated with increased fair hearing requests due to Medi-Cal redeterminations. 10. For the funds appropriated in this item for Child and Family Services Acute Review and Response, the State Department of Social Services shall report annually on January 10 to the policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on key metrics, including, but not limited to, shelter stays for children under six years of age and overstays for youth at short-term residential therapeutic program placements. 11. The Department of Social Services shall provide quarterly updates to legislative staff, including the Legislative Analyst’s Office, on the status of the Care Provider Management Bureau background check system Guardian backlog, beginning August 1, 2024. 12. The Department of Finance may increase expenditure authority in this item up to $250,000 to comply with the federal Able-Bodied Adult Without Dependents (ABAWD) rule. 13. Notwithstanding any other law, upon selection of the State of California for participation in the Pilot Projects for Promoting Accountability by Measuring Work Outcomes program pursuant to Section 302 of the federal Fiscal Responsibility Act of 2023 (Public Law 118-5; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 611(e)), the Department of Finance may augment this item for costs associated with participation in the pilot no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees in each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 14 (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $275,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services to provide the analysis, including cost analysis, required by subdivision (c) of Section 16567 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, , and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. (c) These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. SEC. 17. Item 5225-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 5225-001-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 8,396,668,000 Schedule: (1) 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ 687,460,000 (2) 4505-Peace Officer Selection and Employee Development ........................ 132,779,000125,779,000 (3) 4510-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 73,024,000 (4) 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ 5,112,819,0005,144,069,000 (5) 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ 1,369,909,0001,369,659,000 (6) 4550-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Institution Administration ........................ 607,736,000 (7) 4555-Parole Operations—​Adult Supervision ........................ 375,704,000355,704,000 (8) 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community Based Programs ........................ 99,345,000 (9) 4565-Parole Operations—​Adult Administration ........................ 86,486,00082,486,000 (10) 4570-Sex Offender Management Board and SARATSO Review Committee ........................ 955,000 (11) Reimbursements to 4500-Corrections and Rehabilitation Administration ........................ −4,812,000 (12) Reimbursements to 4505-Peace Officer Selection and Employee Development ........................ −150,000 (13) Reimbursements to 4530-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​General Security ........................ −66,185,000 (14) Reimbursements to 4540-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Inmate Support ........................ −58,263,000 (15) Reimbursements to 4550-Adult Corrections and Rehabilitation Operations—​Institution Administration ........................ −19,074,000 (16) Reimbursements to 4555-Parole Operations—​Adult Supervision ........................ −515,000 (17) Reimbursements to 4560-Parole Operations—​Adult Community Based Programs ........................ −50,000 (18) Reimbursements to 4565-Parole Operations—​Adult Administration ........................ −500,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $62,001,000 shall be used for roof replacements at the Richard J. Donovan Correctional Facility. 2. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall store all audio and video obtained through the statewide correctional video surveillance program for a period of no less than 90 days from the date recorded. Additionally, the following events shall require the department to preserve the recorded data for a longer period as potential evidence in an investigation, or an administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding: (a) Any use of force incident. (b) Riots. (c) Suspected felonious criminal activity. (d) Any incident resulting in serious bodily injury, great bodily injury, or a suspicious death. (e) Sexual assault allegations. (f) Allegations of staff misconduct by an inmate, employee, visitor, or other person. (g) Incidents that may be potentially referred to the district attorney’s office. (h) An employee report to a supervisor of injury. The following events shall require staff to preserve the recorded data for a longer period if filed or reported within 90 days of the event: (1) Inmate claims with the California Victim Compensation Board. (2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs may request to review audio and video recordings when conducting an inquiry as it relates to a submitted third-level appeal. An audio or video recording that becomes evidence in a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Internal Affairs investigation shall be stored until resolution of any investigation and written release by the Office of Internal Affairs, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation’s Office of Legal Affairs, the Attorney General, or the Employment Advocacy and Prosecution Team of the Office of Legal Affairs. An audio or video recording that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has reason to believe may become evidence in an administrative, civil, or criminal proceeding shall be stored indefinitely unless other direction is given by the Office of Legal Affairs or, in the event of a criminal proceeding, the district attorney’s office. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall utilize video obtained through the statewide correctional video surveillance program during the review of staff complaints and other serious appeals and complaints. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedules (4) and (5), $21,070,000 and $1,525,000 is available for the Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program, respectively. Any unencumbered balances of the amounts identified in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2025. 4. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall report spending on class action lawsuits against the department to the budget committees of both houses and the Legislative Analyst’s Office by January 31 of each year. At a minimum, this report shall include spending for each lawsuit in the most recently completed fiscal year on all litigation activities, including, but not limited to, the costs of the department’s legal staff time, payments to outside counsel for legal services, and payments to plaintiffs, monitors, and court experts. 6. It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation scale back the maintenance of deactivated adult and juvenile correctional facilities. Accordingly, Schedules (5) and (6) reflect an ongoing reduction of$5,000,000 for the maintenance of deactivated correctional facilities. The department shall maintain fire and life safety at the department’s deactivated facilities. The department shall submit a plan to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by January 10, 2025, of the status of state-owned deactivated adult and juvenile correctional facility properties for evaluation. The report shall include an inventory of all deactivated facilities, a discussion of any functions the properties are currently serving, and projected timelines for declaring properties as surplus to the Department of General Services. Subsequently, the department shall submit an updated report to the chairpersons of the budget committees of both houses of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by January 10 of each year until 2030. 7. It is the intent of the Legislature that in implementing the state operations reduction pursuant to Section 4.05, no reductions shall be made, to the extent possible, to the level, quantity, or quality of rehabilitative and reentry programming, especially programs provided by community-based non-profit organizations, or of programs related to family connection, including phone calls and the frequency and duration of visitation. The department shall first consider other reductions that do not otherwise violate a court order or jeopardize the health and safety of the staff, incarcerated persons, or the public. The Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program is not included in the category of rehabilitative or reentry programming for the purposes of this provision. SEC. 18. Item 5225-002-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 5225-002-0001—For support of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation ........................ 4,018,290,000 Schedule: (1) 4650-Medical Services—​Adult ........................ 2,715,693,0002,745,693,000 (2) 4655-Dental Services—​Adult ........................ 179,154,000177,154,000 (3) 4660-Mental Health Services—​Adult ........................ 696,366,000671,366,000 (4) 4665-Ancillary Health Care Services—​Adult ........................ 415,386,000 (5) 4670-Dental and Mental Health Services Administration—​Adult ........................ 72,797,00069,797,000 (6) Reimbursements to 4650-Medical Services—​Adult ........................ −60,906,000 (7) Reimbursements to 4665-Ancillary Health Care Services—​Adult ........................ −200,000 Provisions: 1. On February 14, 2006, the United States District Court in the case of Plata v. Newsom (No. C01-1351-JST) suspended the exercise by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation of all powers related to the administration, control, management, operation, and financing of the California prison medical health care system. The court ordered that all such powers vested in the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation were to be performed by a Receiver appointed by the court commencing April 17, 2006, until further order of the court. The Director of the Division of Correctional Health Care Services of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is to administer this item to the extent directed by the Receiver. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is not required to competitively bid for health services contracts in cases in which contracting experience or history indicates that only one qualified bid will be received. 3. Notwithstanding Section 13324 of the Government Code or Section 32.00 of this act, a state employee shall not be held personally liable for any expenditure or the creation of any indebtedness in excess of the amounts appropriated therefor as a result of complying with the directions of the Receiver or orders of the United States District Court in Plata v. Newsom. 4. The amounts appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4) are available for expenditure by the Receiver appointed by the Plata v. Newsom court to carry out its mission to deliver constitutionally adequate medical care to inmates. 5. The amounts appropriated in Schedules (2), (3), and (5) are available for expenditure by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide mental health and dental services only. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Receiver, on behalf of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall process and pay for all medical claims for medical parolees pursuant to Section 3550 of the Penal Code from funds available in Schedule (1). 7. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedules (1) and (4), $126,606,000 and $64,177,000 are available for the Integrated Substance Use Disorder Treatment Program, respectively. Any unencumbered balances of the amounts identified in this provision shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2025. 8. Of the amounts available in Schedule (6) of this item, $16,500,000 is available from the Providing Access and Transforming (PATH) program administered by the Department of Health Care Services to support the development and implementation of the California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal initiative. Notwithstanding any other law, this amount may be adjusted, upon order of the Department of Finance, to align with actual or estimated expenditures for the 2024–25 fiscal year. 9. The amount appropriated in Schedule 4 reflects a reduction of $30,862,000 based on estimated abatement amounts that will be received by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation from the Pharmaceutical Fiscal Intermediary. Notwithstanding any other law, upon order of the Department of Finance, the amount in Schedule 4 may be adjusted to align with actual or estimated abatement amounts that are received or projected to be received from the Pharmaceutical Fiscal Intermediary and to meet cashflow needs resulting from the delay in receipt of abatement amounts. To the extent an adjustment is made pursuant to this provision related to cashflow needs, the Department of Finance may order subsequent adjustments to the amount in Schedule 4 of this item consistent with receipt of abatement amounts. 9.5. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide biannual reporting to the Legislature on abatements received and adjustments made pursuant to Provision 9 by July 31 and January 31 of each year, beginning July 31, 2025, through January 1, 2028. 10. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall work in collaboration with other state agencies, community-based service providers, and other stakeholders as determined by the department, to develop a report focused on alternatives to incarceration for individuals who are advanced in age, disabled, or have significant medical needs. Alternatives may include identifying community correctional reentry centers, Medi-Cal offset possibilities, and the development of new community-based programs, among other alternatives as determined by the department. The report may also identify potential changes the department has or is considering to existing programs, such as the compassionate release, medical parole, and elderly parole programs, to the extent any changes are considered, and any limitations to changes considered. The alternatives shall address the growing number of incarcerated individuals who are advanced in age, disabled, or have significant medical needs. In evaluating the alternatives, the department shall assess the potential to reduce departmental costs, provide the appropriate treatment settings required, challenges faced, and recommendations for accompanying statutory or policy changes that would facilitate the alternatives explored. The department shall provide the report to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2026. 11. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide a report to the Legislature on the department’s plans for establishing statewide in-reach efforts as available under California Advancing and Innovating Medi-Cal (CalAIM) by April 1, 2025. In developing the report, the department shall consult with the Department of Health Care Services and other stakeholders that have experience in reentry or healthcare for the justice-involved population, including, but not limited to, providers of services, community-based organizations, and legal services organizations. 12. The reports required by Provisions 10 and 11 of this item shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. 13. Upon order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall issue payment to the United States District Court for the Eastern District of California for any fines related to staffing vacancies ordered in Coleman v. Newsom. Payment shall be made from the General Fund. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide quarterly reports to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on any fines paid to the court pursuant to this provision. SEC. 19. Item 5225-490 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 5225-490—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2025: 0001—General Fund (1) $135,829,000 in Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) shall be available for other purposes within this item. (2) $124,000,000 in Item 5225-002-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), including up to $30,121,000 originally available for Provision 8 of that item, shall be available for other purposes described in that item. (3) $58,759,000 of the amount provided in Item 5225-008-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) to be transferred to Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). (4) $39,255,000 of the amount provided in Item 5225-008-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) to be transferred to Item 5225-001-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). SEC. 20. Item 6100-161-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6100-161-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), Special Education Programs for Exceptional Children ........................ 5,626,359,0005,453,859,000 Schedule: (1) 5200201-Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs ........................ 5,274,235,0005,101,735,000 (2) 5200206-Special Education Early Intervention Grant ........................ 260,000,000 (3) 5200217-Early Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs ........................ 106,369,000 (4) Reimbursements to 5200217-Early Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs ........................ −14,245,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller in lieu of the amount that otherwise would be appropriated for transfer from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the 2024–25 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 14002 and 41301 of the Education Code, for apportionment pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, superseding all prior law. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $134,413,000 shall be available to provide special education and related services to pupils with low-incidence disabilities pursuant to their individualized education program. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate these funds to special education local plan areas on an equal per-pupil rate using the methodology specified in Section 56836.22 of the Education Code. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $39,738,000 shall be available for the purposes of vocational training and job placement for special education pupils through Project Workability I pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56470) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code. As a condition of receiving these funds, each local educational agency shall certify that the amount of nonfederal resources, exclusive of funds received pursuant to this provision, devoted to the provision of vocational education for special education pupils shall be maintained at or above the level provided in the 1984–85 fiscal year. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may waive this requirement for local educational agencies that demonstrate that the requirement would impose a severe hardship. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $162,053,000 is available to fund the costs of children placed in licensed children’s institutions who attend nonpublic schools based on the funding formula authorized in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. 5. Funds available for infant units shall be allocated with the following average number of pupils per unit: (a) For special classes and centers—​16. (b) For resource specialist programs—​24. (c) For designated instructional services—​16. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, early education programs for infants and toddlers shall be offered for 200 days. Funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be allocated by the State Department of Education for the 2024–25 fiscal year to those programs receiving allocations for instructional units pursuant to Section 56432 of the Education Code for the Early Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs operated pursuant to Chapter 4.4 (commencing with Section 56425) of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, based on computing 200-day entitlements. 7. Notwithstanding any other law, state funds appropriated in Schedule (3) in excess of the amount necessary to fund the deficited entitlements pursuant to Section 56432 of the Education Code shall be available for allocation by the State Department of Education to local educational agencies for the operation of programs serving solely low-incidence infants and toddlers pursuant to Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code. These funds shall be allocated to each local educational agency for each solely low-incidence child through two years of age in excess of the number of solely low-incidence children through two years of age served by the local educational agency during the 1992–93 fiscal year and reported on the April 1993 pupil count. These funds shall only be allocated if the amount of reimbursement received from the State Department of Developmental Services is insufficient to fully fund the costs of operating the Early Intervention Program, as authorized by Title 14 (commencing with Section 95000) of the Government Code. 8. Funds appropriated in this item, unless otherwise specified, are available for the sole purpose of funding 2024–25 fiscal year special education program costs and shall not be used to fund any prior year adjustments, claims, or costs. 9. Of the amount provided in Schedule (1), up to $207,000 shall be available to fully fund the declining enrollment of necessary small special education local plan areas pursuant to Chapter 551 of the Statutes of 2001. 10. Pursuant to Section 56427 of the Education Code, of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $2,324,000 may be used to provide funding for infant programs, and may be used for those programs that do not qualify for funding pursuant to Section 56432 of the Education Code. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $1,317,000 shall be used for a personnel development program. This program shall include state-sponsored staff development for special education personnel to have the necessary content knowledge and skills to serve children with disabilities. This funding may include training and services targeting special education teachers and related service personnel that teach core academic or multiple subjects to meet the applicable special education requirements of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.). 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $1,480,000 is available for the state’s share of costs in the settlement of Emma C. v. Delaine Eastin, et al. (N.D. Cal. No. C96-4179TEH). The State Department of Education shall report by January 1 of each year to the fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the planned use of the additional special education funds provided to the Ravenswood City Elementary School District pursuant to this settlement. The report shall also provide the State Department of Education’s best estimate of when this supplemental funding will no longer be required by the court. The State Department of Education shall comply with the requirements of Section 948 of the Government Code in any further request for funds to satisfy this settlement. 13. Notwithstanding any other law, state funds appropriated in Schedule (1) in excess of the amount necessary to fund the defined entitlement shall be to fulfill other shortages in entitlements budgeted in this schedule by the State Department of Education, upon Department of Finance approval, to any program funded under Schedule (1). 14. Of the amount specified in Schedule (1), $453,169,000 shall be available only to provide mental health related services to students with or without an individualized education program, including out-of-home residential services for emotionally disturbed pupils, pursuant to pending legislation. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate these funds to local educational agencies based upon an equal rate per pupil using the methodology specified in Section 56836.07 of the Education Code. 15. The funds appropriated in this item reflect an adjustment to the base funding of 2.563 percent for the annual adjustment in statewide average daily attendance. 16. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), up to $20,000,000 is available for extraordinary costs associated with single placements. Special education local plan areas are eligible to submit claims for costs exceeding the threshold amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56836.21 of the Education Code, on forms developed by the State Department of Education pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.21 of the Education Code. Funds shall be first available to fully reimburse extraordinary costs associated with educationally related mental health services, including out-of-home residential services for necessary small special education local plan areas, as defined in Section 56212 of the Education Code. Remaining funds shall be available for reimbursements for placements in nonpublic, nonsectarian schools, pursuant to Section 56836.21 of the Education Code, and pupils residing in licensed children’s institutions. 17. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall first be considered offsetting revenues within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code for any reimbursable mandated cost claim for behavioral intervention plans (CSM 4464), inclusive of activities performed pursuant to Sections 56521.1 and 56521.2 of the Education Code. 18. Of the funds provided for in Schedule (1), $64,810,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 19. Of the funds provided for in Schedule (3), $1,126,000 is to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment. 20. Of the funds provided in Schedule (1), $12,000,000 shall be allocated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to special education local plan areas, county offices of education or consortia of special education local plan areas, and county offices of education selected pursuant to Section 52073.2 of the Education Code to provide technical assistance to local educational agencies as provided in Section 52071 of the Education Code. 21. Of the funds provided in Schedule (1), the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion the amount determined pursuant to Section 56836.24 of the Education Code for regionalized operations and services and the direct instructional support of program specialists to special education local plan areas that perform all functions pursuant to Section 56836.23 of the Education Code in accordance with the description set forth in its local plan adopted pursuant to Section 56205 of the Education Code. 22. Of the amount specified in Schedule (1), up to $3,514,000 shall be available for small special education local plan areas to conduct regionalized services, pursuant to Section 56836.31 of the Education Code. 23. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) is available for the special education early intervention preschool grant pursuant to Section 56836.40 of the Education Code. 24. Any decrease of funding in this item shall only be to align the item to updated expenditure estimates and shall not cause reductions to special education apportionments to special education local plan areas or local educational agencies. SEC. 21. Item 6120-492 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 6120-492—Reappropriation, State Library. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated to San Francisco Hillel for renovation of the San Francisco Hillel Facilities and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2028. 0001—General Fund (1) Subparagraph (Q) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 19.56, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the City of San Diego for Hillel San Diego for the construction of the Beverly and Joseph Glickman Hillel Center. SEC. 22. Item 6980-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6980-101-0001—For local assistance, Student Aid Commission ........................ 2,985,570,0002,987,717,000 Schedule: (1) 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ 3,406,179,0003,408,326,000 (2) Reimbursements to 5755-Financial Aid Grants Program ........................ −420,609,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for costs of all of the following: (a) The Cal Grant Program, pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (b) The Law Enforcement Personnel Dependents Scholarship Program, pursuant to Section 4709 of the Labor Code. (c) The Assumption Program of Loans for Education, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 69612) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (d) The State Nursing Assumption Program of Loans for Education (SNAPLE), pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 70100) of Chapter 3 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (e) The Middle Class Scholarship Program, pursuant to Article 22 (commencing with Section 70020) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. The Director of Finance, no later than February 1, 2025, shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the total proposed funding amount for the Middle Class Scholarship Program for the 2025–26 budget year to provide the California Student Aid Commission guidance for planning award amounts for newly, continuing, and returning eligible students. Within 30 days of receipt of the notification, the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee may respond with additional guidance for the California Student Aid Commission. Funding provided in the Budget Act of 2025 for the Middle Class Scholarship Program will ultimately determine available funding. (f) The Cash for College Program, pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 69551) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (g) The Student Opportunity and Access Program (Cal-SOAP), pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 69560) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (h) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,400,000 is available on an ongoing basis to support the Inland Empire Cal-SOAP projects. 1.1. The Student Aid Commission shall report to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by December 1, 2025, regarding the use of funds specified in subprovision (f) of Provision 1. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information regarding the Cash for College program in 2024–25: (a) A list of regional coordinating organizations specifying, for each organization, whether it was newly added to the program in 2024–25, and the areas of the state that it covers. (b) The services provided by the program, including the number of financial aid application workshops hosted. (c) The number of students participating in financial aid application workshops and the number of those students who completed a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act Application. (d) A description of the coordination between the program and other financial aid outreach efforts conducted by state agencies, local educational agencies, and other entities. 1.2. Of the reimbursements identified in Schedule (2) of this item, $500,000 is for the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) support for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. 1.3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 is for Federal Title II, Part A support for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program and shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure through June 30, 2026. 1.5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,500,000 is to fund the activities pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 69438) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 1.6 Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to support the California College of the Arts located in San Francisco California. The California College of the Arts shall submit a report to the Department of Finance by November 2026, regarding how the college used the funds to support or maintain programming or services for students attending the college. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the maximum Cal Grant award for: (a) New recipients attending private, for-profit institutions that are not accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges as of July 1, 2023, shall be $4,000. (b) New recipients attending private, for-profit institutions that are accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges as of July 1, 2023, shall be $8,056. (c) All recipients attending private, nonprofit institutions shall be $9,358. (d) All recipients of Cal Grant B access awards shall be $1,648. (e) All recipients receiving Cal Grant C tuition and fee awards shall be $2,462. (f) All recipients attending community colleges receiving Cal Grant C book and supply awards shall be $1,094. (g) All recipients not attending community colleges receiving Cal Grant C book and supply awards shall be $547. (h) All University of California student recipients receiving Cal Grant awards shall be the amount approved for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees by the Regents of the University of California for the 2024–25 academic year. (i) All California State University student recipients receiving Cal Grant awards shall be the amount approved for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees by the Trustees of the California State University for the 2024–25 academic year. 3. Notwithstanding Provision 2 of this item and any other law: (a) All Cal Grant A award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, or a private nonprofit institution and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall also receive an access award. The maximum amount of this access award shall be $6,000. (b) All Cal Grant B access award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (c) All Cal Grant C book and supply award recipients attending a California Community College and who have a dependent child or dependent children shall have a maximum book and supply award of $4,000. 4. Notwithstanding Provision 2 of this item and any other law: (a) All Cal Grant A award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (b) All Cal Grant B award recipients attending a University of California, California State University, California Community College, or a private nonprofit institution and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum access award of $6,000. (c) All Cal Grant C book and supply award recipients attending a California Community College and who are former or current foster youth shall have a maximum book and supply award of $4,000. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an augmentation, from the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties established pursuant to Section 16418 of the Government Code, of the amount appropriated in this item to make Cal Grant awards, pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. No augmentation may be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Department of Finance provides notice of the intended augmentation to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund for cashflow purposes, in an amount not to exceed $125,000,000, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from a delay in the receipt of reimbursements from federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds. (b) The Student Aid Commission has received confirmation from the State Department of Social Services that there are no available TANF resources that could be advanced to them. (c) The loan is for a short-term need and shall be repaid within 90 days of the loan’s origination date. (d) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. SEC. 23. Item 7350-490 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 7350-490—Reappropriation, Department of Industrial Relations. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0223—Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund (1) Up to $22,194,000 from Schedule (2) of Item 7350-001-0223, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) for support of the Electronic Adjudication Management System modernization. SEC. 24. Item 9889-011-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 9889-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller, upon order of the Department of Finance, to the Public School System Stabilization Account ........................ 1,053,983,000455,025,000 Provisions: 1. The transfer specified in this item shall apply towards any transfer to the Public School System Stabilization Account required by Section 21 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the 2024-25 fiscal year, including any additional transfers for that year subsequently required by the true-up calculations specified in subdivision (b) of that Section. 2. The funds transferred under this item shall be governed by the rules set forth in Section 21 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. The funds shall be allocated and appropriated for the support of school districts and community college districts after the 2024-25 fiscal year based upon the calculations set forth in subdivision (i) of that Section. 3. Consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 21 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the transfer specified in this item shall occur on or before October 1. 4. It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce the transfer specified in this item through future legislation if necessary to maintain school and community college programs in 2024-25 at the level authorized in the enacted budget. 5. The funds transferred to the Public School System Stabilization Account in this item shall be deemed, for purposes of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, to be moneys applied by the State for the support of school districts and community college districts in the 2024-25 fiscal year, and not in the fiscal year in which the funds are appropriated from the account. SEC. 25. Section 15.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is repealed. SEC. 15.00.(a)The following amounts are hereby appropriated from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund to the following entities:(1)$30,904,000 to the Sierra Nevada Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (h) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code.(2)$23,524,000 to the California Tahoe Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (i) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code.(3)$31,349,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (j) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code.(4)$30,904,000 to the State Coastal Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (k) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code.(5)$30,904,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (l) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code.(6)$23,524,000 to the San Diego River Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (m) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code.(7)$10,000,000 to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to fund training center infrastructure for a fire resiliency center for the Karuk Tribe pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code.(b)The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement appropriations in this section from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature to consider other statutory adjustments related to the Administrative Procedure Act, as it relates to appropriations from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund, in conjunction with enactment of the Budget Act of 2025.(c)The funds appropriated in this section are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 26. Section 15.80 of the Budget Act of 2024 is repealed. SEC. 15.80.For implementation of reparations legislation that is enacted into law, the Director of Finance may augment one or more items in this act by no more than $12,000,000 from the General Fund. SEC. 27. Section 15.80 is added to the Budget Act of 2024, to read: SEC. 15.80. The following appropriations are hereby made from the General Fund: (a) $6,000,000 to the California State University for purposes of implementing legislation related to genealogy determination. (b) $6,000,000 for allocation to the Tides Foundation to educate Californians on the findings of the California Reparations Task Force report. (c) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026. SEC. 28. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2024 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 107). (b) Chapter 35 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 108). (c) Chapter 994 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 157). (d) Chapter 995 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 180). (e) Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Assembly Bill No. 4). (f) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 3). (g) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 1). (h) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 2). (i) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). SEC. 29. Section 90.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 90.00. (a) The Director of Finance may augment the amount of any department or agency appropriation from any available source of funding, including, but not limited to, the General Fund for the purposes described in this section. Augmentations pursuant to this section shall not exceed a cumulative total of $1,500,000,000. (b) Augmentations pursuant to subdivision (a) are hereby authorized for use by state departments and entities for uses consistent with the purposes of the Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account concerning areas of the state affected by wildfire states of emergency that were declared by the Governor in January 2025. Those uses include, but are not limited to, emergency protective measures, evacuations, sheltering for survivors, household hazardous waste removal, assessment and remediation of post-fire hazards such as flash flooding and debris flows, traffic control, air quality and water and other environmental testing, and other actions to protect health, protect the safety of persons or property, and expedite recovery. (c) Augmentations authorized pursuant to this section shall not be made sooner than three days following the transmittal of a notification of the approval to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or an earlier date as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, except that, for the first $1,000,000,000 of augmentation authority pursuant to subdivision (a), the augmentations may be implemented in full immediately with no delay upon such a notification to the chairperson. (d) This section does not change, alter, limit, or constrain the emergency powers of the Governor and the executive branch in state law, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s fiscal authority related to emergencies. (e) Funds authorized by augmentations pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure consistent with the existing encumbrance deadlines for the items of appropriation that are augmented or an alternate date as determined by the Director of Finance. The Department of Finance may create new items as necessary to facilitate the expenditure of funds augmented pursuant to this section. (f) (1) The Director of Finance may also augment any appropriation for the Office of Emergency Services to provide funding to be disbursed to Los Angeles County or cities within the county for unmet response and recovery needs resulting from damage caused by the Eaton Fire and Palisades Fire in Los Angeles County in January 2025. Funding provided pursuant to this paragraph shall not duplicate or replace benefits available or received through other existing assistance programs. (2) To the extent any reimbursements are awarded for work funded pursuant to this subdivision, those reimbursements shall be deposited into the General Fund. (g) (1) The Director of Finance may also augment any appropriation to provide backfills to affected taxing entities for property tax revenue losses occurring in the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years resulting from damages caused by the Eaton Fire and Palisades Fire in Los Angeles County in January 2025. (2) For purposes of this subdivision, “affected taxing entities” means counties, cities, and independent special districts. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of whether a special district is independent. (3) To receive funds pursuant to this subdivision, the county auditor-controller shall submit to the Department of Finance a countywide claim detailing the losses incurred by affected taxing entities located in the county due to property damage caused by the wildfires described in this subdivision. The Department of Finance shall review the claims, and upon determining the claims are accurate and complete, shall provide notification as specified in subdivision (c). Once the requirements of subdivision (c) are fulfilled, the Department of Finance shall notify the Controller, who shall provide reimbursement in the amount specified by the Department of Finance to the county auditor-controller, who shall allocate those funds to the affected taxing entities as specified. (4) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may augment Item 9210-102-0001 of this act or the Budget Act of 2025 for any property tax backfills authorized pursuant to this subdivision for cities, counties, and independent special districts. The allocation of funds authorized pursuant to this subdivision from Item 9210-102-0001 shall be governed solely by the provisions of this section. (h) (1) Augmentations authorized pursuant to this section and Section 90.01 of this act for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) shall be made on or before June 30, 2025. (2) Augmentations authorized pursuant to this section and Section 90.01 of this act for the purposes specified in subdivisions (f) and (g) shall be made on or before June 30, 2026. SEC. 30. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Savings 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 5.26 Legal Services Grant Funding 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect  Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.93 Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account  Reconciliation Adjustments 11.95 Federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 Home and  Community-Based Services Funding 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund  Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of  Consumer Affairs 15.00 Proposition 4 Appropriations 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 15.80 Reparations Legislation Funding 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General  Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision,  and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries and  Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates  Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 39.10 List of Budget Act Statutes 90.00 Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 90.01 Additional Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 31. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately. SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.